Texas statutes.
PROPERTY CODE

TITLE 2. CONVEYANCES

CHAPTER 5. CONVEYANCES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 5.001. FEE SIMPLE. (a) An estate in land that is conveyed or devised is a fee simple unless the estate is limited by express words or unless a lesser estate is conveyed or devised by construction or operation of law. Words previously necessary at common law to transfer a fee simple estate are not necessary.

(b) This section applies only to a conveyance occurring on or after February 5, 1840.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3480, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 5.002. FAILING AS A CONVEYANCE. An instrument intended as a conveyance of real property or an interest in real property that, because of this chapter, fails as a conveyance in whole or in part is enforceable to the extent permitted by law as a contract to convey the property or interest.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3480, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 5.003. PARTIAL CONVEYANCE. (a) An alienation of real property that purports to transfer a greater right or estate in the property than the person making the alienation may lawfully transfer alienates only the right or estate that the person may convey.

(b) Neither the alienation by deed or will of an estate on which a remainder depends nor the union of the estate with an inheritance by purchase or descent affects the remainder.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3480, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 5.004. CONVEYANCE BY AUTHORIZED OFFICER. (a) A conveyance of real property by an officer legally authorized to sell the property under a judgment of a court within the state passes absolute title to the property to the purchaser.

(b) This section does not affect the rights of a person who is not or who does not claim under a party to the conveyance or judgment.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3480, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 5.005. ALIENS. An alien has the same real and personal property rights as a United States citizen.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3481, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 5.006. ATTORNEY'S FEES IN BREACH OF RESTRICTIVE COVENANT ACTION. (a) In an action based on breach of a restrictive covenant pertaining to real property, the court shall allow to a prevailing party who asserted the action reasonable attorney's fees in addition to the party's costs and claim.

(b) To determine reasonable attorney's fees, the court shall consider:

(1) the time and labor required;

(2) the novelty and difficulty of the questions;

(3) the expertise, reputation, and ability of the attorney; and

(4) any other factor.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3481, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 5.007. VENDOR AND PURCHASER RISK ACT. (a) Any contract made in this state for the purchase and sale of real property shall be interpreted as including an agreement that the parties have the rights and duties prescribed by this section, unless the contract expressly provides otherwise.

(b) If, when neither the legal title nor the possession of the subject matter of the contract has been transferred, all or a material part of the property is destroyed without fault of the purchaser or is taken by eminent domain, the vendor may not enforce the contract, and the purchaser is entitled to recover any portion of the contract price paid.

(c) If, when either the legal title or the possession of the subject matter of the contract has been transferred, all or any part of the property is destroyed without fault of the vendor or is taken by eminent domain, the purchaser is not relieved from the duty to pay the contract price, nor is the purchaser entitled to recover any portion of the price already paid.

(d) This section shall be interpreted and construed to accomplish its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states that enact the Uniform Vendor and Purchaser Risk Act.

(e) This section may be cited as the Uniform Vendor and Purchaser Risk Act.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1002, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 5.008. SELLER'S DISCLOSURE OF PROPERTY CONDITION. (a) A seller of residential real property comprising not more than one dwelling unit located in this state shall give to the purchaser of the property a written notice as prescribed by this section or a written notice substantially similar to the notice prescribed by this section which contains, at a minimum, all of the items in the notice prescribed by this section.

(b) The notice must be executed and must, at a minimum, read substantially similar to the following:

SELLER'S DISCLOSURE NOTICE

CONCERNING THE PROPERTY AT ___________________________________

(Street Address and City)

THIS NOTICE IS A DISCLOSURE OF SELLER'S KNOWLEDGE OF THE CONDITION OF THE PROPERTY AS OF THE DATE SIGNED BY SELLER AND IS NOT A SUBSTITUTE FOR ANY INSPECTIONS OR WARRANTIES THE PURCHASER MAY WISH TO OBTAIN. IT IS NOT A WARRANTY OF ANY KIND BY SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENTS.

Seller __ is __ is not occupying the Property.

If unoccupied, how long since Seller has occupied the Property?

________________________________________________________________

1. The Property has the items checked below:

Write Yes (Y), No (N), or Unknown (U).

__ Range __ Oven __ Microwave

__ Dishwasher __ Trash Compactor __ Disposal

__ Washer/Dryer __ Window __ Rain Gutters

Hookups Screens

__ Security __ Fire Detection __ Intercom

System Equipment System

__ Smoke Detector

__ Smoke Detector -

Hearing Impaired

__ Carbon Monoxide

Alarm

__ Emergency Escape

Ladder(s)

__ TV Antenna __ Cable TV __ Satellite

Wiring Dish

__ Ceiling Fan(s) __ Attic Fan(s) __ Exhaust

Fan(s)

__ Central A/C __ Central Heating __ Wall/Window

Air

Conditioning

__ Plumbing System __ Septic System __ Public Sewer

System

__ Patio/Decking __ Outdoor Grill __ Fences

__ Pool __ Sauna __ Spa

__ Hot Tub

__ Pool Equipment __ Pool Heater __ Automatic Lawn

Sprinkler

System

__ Fireplace(s) & __ Fireplace(s) &

Chimney Chimney

(Woodburning) (Mock)

__ Natural Gas Lines __ Gas Fixtures

__ Liquid Propane Gas: __ LP Community __ LP on Property

(Captive)

__ Fuel Gas Piping: __ Black Iron Pipe __ Corrugated

__ Copper Stainless Steel

Tubing

Garage: __ Attached __ Not Attached __ Carport

Garage Door Opener(s): __ Electronic __ Control(s)

Water Heater: __ Gas __ Electric

Water Supply: __ City __ Well __ MUD __ Co-op

Roof Type: ________________________________ Age: _____(approx)

Are you (Seller) aware of any of the above items that are not in working condition, that have known defects, or that are in need of repair? __ Yes __ No __ Unknown.

If yes, then describe. (Attach additional sheets if necessary):

________________________________________________________________

________________________________________________________________

2. Does the property have working smoke detectors installed in accordance with the smoke detector requirements of Chapter 766, Health and Safety Code?* __ Yes __ No __ Unknown.

If the answer to the question above is no or unknown, explain. (Attach additional sheets if necessary):

*Chapter 766 of the Health and Safety Code requires one-family or two-family dwellings to have working smoke detectors installed in accordance with the requirements of the building code in effect in the area in which the dwelling is located, including performance, location, and power source requirements. If you do not know the building code requirements in effect in your area, you may check unknown above or contact your local building official for more information. A buyer may require a seller to install smoke detectors for the hearing impaired if: (1) the buyer or a member of the buyer's family who will reside in the dwelling is hearing impaired; (2) the buyer gives the seller written evidence of the hearing impairment from a licensed physician; and (3) within 10 days after the effective date, the buyer makes a written request for the seller to install smoke detectors for the hearing impaired and specifies the locations for installation. The parties may agree who will bear the cost of installing the smoke detectors and which brand of smoke detectors to install.

3. Are you (Seller) aware of any known defects/malfunctions in any of the following?

Write Yes (Y) if you are aware, write No (N) if you are not aware.

__ Interior Walls __ Ceilings __ Floors

__ Exterior Walls __ Doors __ Windows

__ Roof __ Foundation/ __ Basement

Slab(s)

__ Walls/Fences __ Driveways __ Sidewalks

__ Plumbing/Sewers/ __ Electrical __ Lighting

Septics Systems Fixtures

__ Other Structural Components (Describe):_______________________

________________________________________________________________

________________________________________________________________

If the answer to any of the above is yes, explain. (Attach additional sheets if necessary):________________________________

________________________________________________________________

________________________________________________________________

4. Are you (Seller) aware of any of the following conditions?

Write Yes (Y) if you are aware, write No (N) if you are not aware.

__ Active Termites __ Previous Structural

(includes or Roof Repair

wood-destroying insects)

__ Termite or Wood Rot Damage __ Hazardous or Toxic Waste

Needing Repair

__ Previous Termite Damage __ Asbestos Components

__ Previous Termite __ Urea formaldehyde

Treatment Insulation

__ Radon Gas

__ Improper Drainage __ Lead Based Paint

__ Water Damage Not Due to a __ Aluminum Wiring

Flood Event

__ Previous Fires

__ Unplatted Easements

__ Landfill, Settling, Soil __ Subsurface

Movement, Fault Lines Structure or Pits

__ Single Blockable Main __ Previous Use of Premises

Drain in Pool/Hot for Manufacture of

Tub/Spa* Methamphetamine

If the answer to any of the above is yes, explain. (Attach additional sheets if necessary):________________________________

________________________________________________________________

________________________________________________________________

*A single blockable main drain may cause a suction entrapment hazard for an individual.

5. Are you (Seller) aware of any item, equipment, or system in or on the property that is in need of repair? __ Yes (if you are aware) __ No (if you are not aware). If yes, explain (attach additional sheets as necessary). _________________________________

6. Are you (Seller) aware of any of the following conditions?* Write Yes (Y) if you are aware, write No (N) if you are not aware.

__ Present flood insurance coverage

__ Previous flooding due to a failure or breach of a reservoir or a controlled or emergency release of water from a reservoir

__ Previous water penetration into a structure on the property due to a natural flood event

Write Yes (Y) if you are aware and check wholly or partly as applicable, write No (N) if you are not aware.

__ Located ( ) wholly ( ) partly in a 100-year floodplain (Special Flood Hazard Area-Zone A, V, A99, AE, AO, AH, VE, or AR)

__ Located ( ) wholly ( ) partly in a 500-year floodplain (Moderate Flood Hazard Area-Zone X (shaded))

__ Located ( ) wholly ( ) partly in a floodway

__ Located ( ) wholly ( ) partly in a flood pool

__ Located ( ) wholly ( ) partly in a reservoir

If the answer to any of the above is yes, explain (attach additional sheets as necessary):

* For purposes of this notice:

"100-year floodplain" means any area of land that:

(A) is identified on the flood insurance rate map as a special flood hazard area, which is designated as Zone A, V, A99, AE, AO, AH, VE, or AR on the map;

(B) has a one percent annual chance of flooding, which is considered to be a high risk of flooding; and

(C) may include a regulatory floodway, flood pool, or reservoir.

"500-year floodplain" means any area of land that:

(A) is identified on the flood insurance rate map as a moderate flood hazard area, which is designated on the map as Zone X (shaded); and

(B) has a two-tenths of one percent annual chance of flooding, which is considered to be a moderate risk of flooding.

"Flood pool" means the area adjacent to a reservoir that lies above the normal maximum operating level of the reservoir and that is subject to controlled inundation under the management of the United States Army Corps of Engineers.

"Flood insurance rate map" means the most recent flood hazard map published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency under the National Flood Insurance Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. Section 4001 et seq.).

"Floodway" means an area that is identified on the flood insurance rate map as a regulatory floodway, which includes the channel of a river or other watercourse and the adjacent land areas that must be reserved for the discharge of a base flood, also referred to as a 100-year flood, without cumulatively increasing the water surface elevation more than a designated height.

"Reservoir" means a water impoundment project operated by the United States Army Corps of Engineers that is intended to retain water or delay the runoff of water in a designated surface area of land.

7. Have you (Seller) ever filed a claim for flood damage to the property with any insurance provider, including the National Flood Insurance Program (NFIP)?* __ Yes __ No. If yes, explain (attach additional sheets as necessary):

*Homes in high risk flood zones with mortgages from federally regulated or insured lenders are required to have flood insurance. Even when not required, the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) encourages homeowners in high risk, moderate risk, and low risk flood zones to purchase flood insurance that covers the structure(s) and the personal property within the structure(s).

8. Have you (Seller) ever received assistance from FEMA or the U.S. Small Business Administration (SBA) for flood damage to the property? __ Yes __ No. If yes, explain (attach additional sheets as necessary):

9. Are you (Seller) aware of any of the following?

Write Yes (Y) if you are aware, write No (N) if you are not aware.

__ Room additions, structural modifications, or other alterations or repairs made without necessary permits or not in compliance with building codes in effect at that time.

__ Homeowners' Association or maintenance fees or assessments.

__ Any "common area" (facilities such as pools, tennis courts, walkways, or other areas) co-owned in undivided interest with others.

__ Any notices of violations of deed restrictions or governmental ordinances affecting the condition or use of the Property.

__ Any lawsuits directly or indirectly affecting the Property.

__ Any condition on the Property which materially affects the physical health or safety of an individual.

__ Any rainwater harvesting system located on the property that is larger than 500 gallons and that uses a public water supply as an auxiliary water source.

__ Any portion of the property that is located in a groundwater conservation district or a subsidence district.

If the answer to any of the above is yes, explain. (Attach additional sheets if necessary): ______________________________

________________________________________________________________

________________________________________________________________

10. If the property is located in a coastal area that is seaward of the Gulf Intracoastal Waterway or within 1,000 feet of the mean high tide bordering the Gulf of Mexico, the property may be subject to the Open Beaches Act or the Dune Protection Act (Chapter 61 or 63, Natural Resources Code, respectively) and a beachfront construction certificate or dune protection permit may be required for repairs or improvements. Contact the local government with ordinance authority over construction adjacent to public beaches for more information.

11. This property may be located near a military installation and may be affected by high noise or air installation compatible use zones or other operations. Information relating to high noise and compatible use zones is available in the most recent Air Installation Compatible Use Zone Study or Joint Land Use Study prepared for a military installation and may be accessed on the Internet website of the military installation and of the county and any municipality in which the military installation is located.

_______________ ________________________________________

Date Signature of Seller

The undersigned purchaser hereby acknowledges receipt of the foregoing notice.

_______________ ________________________________________

Date Signature of Purchaser

(c) A seller or seller's agent shall have no duty to make a disclosure or release information related to whether a death by natural causes, suicide, or accident unrelated to the condition of the property occurred on the property or whether a previous occupant had, may have had, has, or may have AIDS, HIV related illnesses, or HIV infection.

(d) The notice shall be completed to the best of seller's belief and knowledge as of the date the notice is completed and signed by the seller. If the information required by the notice is unknown to the seller, the seller shall indicate that fact on the notice, and by that act is in compliance with this section.

(e) This section does not apply to a transfer:

(1) pursuant to a court order or foreclosure sale;

(2) by a trustee in bankruptcy;

(3) to a mortgagee by a mortgagor or successor in interest, or to a beneficiary of a deed of trust by a trustor or successor in interest;

(4) by a mortgagee or a beneficiary under a deed of trust who has acquired the real property at a sale conducted pursuant to a power of sale under a deed of trust or a sale pursuant to a court ordered foreclosure or has acquired the real property by a deed in lieu of foreclosure;

(5) by a fiduciary in the course of the administration of a decedent's estate, guardianship, conservatorship, or trust;

(6) from one co-owner to one or more other co-owners;

(7) made to a spouse or to a person or persons in the lineal line of consanguinity of one or more of the transferors;

(8) between spouses resulting from a decree of dissolution of marriage or a decree of legal separation or from a property settlement agreement incidental to such a decree;

(9) to or from any governmental entity;

(10) of a new residence of not more than one dwelling unit which has not previously been occupied for residential purposes; or

(11) of real property where the value of any dwelling does not exceed five percent of the value of the property.

(f) The notice shall be delivered by the seller to the purchaser on or before the effective date of an executory contract binding the purchaser to purchase the property. If a contract is entered without the seller providing the notice required by this section, the purchaser may terminate the contract for any reason within seven days after receiving the notice.

(g) In this section:

(1) "Blockable main drain" means a main drain of any size and shape that a human body can sufficiently block to create a suction entrapment hazard.

(2) "Main drain" means a submerged suction outlet typically located at the bottom of a swimming pool or spa to conduct water to a recirculating pump.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 356, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 17.001, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 448 (H.B. 271), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2008.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1051 (H.B. 2118), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1256 (H.B. 2819), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 20.001, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1178 (H.B. 3502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2010.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 578 (H.B. 3389), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 621 (S.B. 710), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1311 (H.B. 3391), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 695 (H.B. 2781), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 524 (H.B. 1221), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 35 (H.B. 890), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1307 (H.B. 3815), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1337 (S.B. 339), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 390 (H.B. 697), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 5.009. DUTIES OF LIFE TENANT. (a) Subject to Subsection (b), if the life tenant of a legal life estate is given the power to sell and reinvest any life tenancy property, the life tenant is subject, with respect to the sale and investment of the property, to all of the fiduciary duties of a trustee imposed by the Texas Trust Code (Subtitle B, Title 9, Property Code) or the common law of this state.

(b) A life tenant may retain, as life tenancy property, any real property originally conveyed to the life tenant without being subject to the fiduciary duties of a trustee; however, the life tenant is subject to the common law duties of a life tenant.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 846, Sec. 34, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.008 by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 17.01(42), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 5.010. NOTICE OF ADDITIONAL TAX LIABILITY. (a) A person who is the owner of an interest in vacant land and who contracts for the transfer of that interest shall include in the contract the following bold-faced notice:

NOTICE REGARDING POSSIBLE LIABILITY FOR ADDITIONAL TAXES

If for the current ad valorem tax year the taxable value of the land that is the subject of this contract is determined by a special appraisal method that allows for appraisal of the land at less than its market value, the person to whom the land is transferred may not be allowed to qualify the land for that special appraisal in a subsequent tax year and the land may then be appraised at its full market value. In addition, the transfer of the land or a subsequent change in the use of the land may result in the imposition of an additional tax plus interest as a penalty for the transfer or the change in the use of the land. The taxable value of the land and the applicable method of appraisal for the current tax year is public information and may be obtained from the tax appraisal district established for the county in which the land is located.

(b) This section does not apply to a contract for a transfer:

(1) under a court order or foreclosure sale;

(2) by a trustee in bankruptcy;

(3) to a mortgagee by a mortgagor or successor in interest or to a beneficiary of a deed of trust by a trustor or successor in interest;

(4) by a mortgagee or a beneficiary under a deed of trust who has acquired the land at a sale conducted under a power of sale under a deed of trust or a sale under a court-ordered foreclosure or has acquired the land by a deed in lieu of foreclosure;

(5) by a fiduciary in the course of the administration of a decedent's estate, guardianship, conservatorship, or trust;

(6) of only a mineral interest, leasehold interest, or security interest; or

(7) to or from a governmental entity.

(c) The notice described by Subsection (a) is not required to be included in a contract for transfer of an interest in land if every transferee under the contract is:

(1) a person who is a co-owner with an owner described by Subsection (a) of an undivided interest in the land; or

(2) a spouse or a person in the lineal line of consanguinity of an owner described by Subsection (a).

(d) The notice described by Subsection (a) is not required to be given if in a separate paragraph of the contract the contract expressly provides for the payment of any additional ad valorem taxes and interest that become due as a penalty because of:

(1) the transfer of the land; or

(2) a subsequent change in the use of the land.

(e) If the owner fails to include in the contract the notice described by Subsection (a), the person to whom the land is transferred is entitled to recover from that owner an amount equal to the amount of any additional taxes and interest that the person is required to pay as a penalty because of:

(1) the transfer of the land; or

(2) a subsequent change in the use of the land that occurs before the fifth anniversary of the date of the transfer.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 174, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1998.

Sec. 5.011. SELLER'S DISCLOSURE REGARDING POTENTIAL ANNEXATION. (a) A person who sells an interest in real property in this state shall give to the purchaser of the property a written notice that reads substantially similar to the following:

NOTICE REGARDING POSSIBLE ANNEXATION

If the property that is the subject of this contract is located outside the limits of a municipality, the property may now or later be included in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality and may now or later be subject to annexation by the municipality. Each municipality maintains a map that depicts its boundaries and extraterritorial jurisdiction. To determine if the property is located within a municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction or is likely to be located within a municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction, contact all municipalities located in the general proximity of the property for further information.

(b) The seller shall deliver the notice to the purchaser before the date the executory contract binds the purchaser to purchase the property. The notice may be given separately, as part of the contract during negotiations, or as part of any other notice the seller delivers to the purchaser.

(c) This section does not apply to a transfer:

(1) under a court order or foreclosure sale;

(2) by a trustee in bankruptcy;

(3) to a mortgagee by a mortgagor or successor in interest or to a beneficiary of a deed of trust by a trustor or successor in interest;

(4) by a mortgagee or a beneficiary under a deed of trust who has acquired the land at a sale conducted under a power of sale under a deed of trust or a sale under a court-ordered foreclosure or has acquired the land by a deed in lieu of foreclosure;

(5) by a fiduciary in the course of the administration of a decedent's estate, guardianship, conservatorship, or trust;

(6) from one co-owner to another co-owner of an undivided interest in the real property;

(7) to a spouse or a person in the lineal line of consanguinity of the seller;

(8) to or from a governmental entity;

(9) of only a mineral interest, leasehold interest, or security interest; or

(10) of real property that is located wholly within a municipality's corporate boundaries.

(d) If the notice is delivered as provided by this section, the seller has no duty to provide additional information regarding the possible annexation of the property by a municipality.

(e) If an executory contract is entered into without the seller providing the notice required by this section, the purchaser may terminate the contract for any reason within the earlier of:

(1) seven days after the date the purchaser receives the notice; or

(2) the date the transfer occurs.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 529, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2000.

Sec. 5.012. NOTICE OF OBLIGATIONS RELATED TO MEMBERSHIP IN PROPERTY OWNERS' ASSOCIATION. (a) A seller of residential real property that is subject to membership in a property owners' association and that comprises not more than one dwelling unit located in this state shall give to the purchaser of the property a written notice that reads substantially similar to the following:

NOTICE OF MEMBERSHIP IN PROPERTY OWNERS' ASSOCIATION CONCERNING THE PROPERTY AT (street address) (name of residential community)

As a purchaser of property in the residential community in which this property is located, you are obligated to be a member of a property owners' association. Restrictive covenants governing the use and occupancy of the property and all dedicatory instruments governing the establishment, maintenance, or operation of this residential community have been or will be recorded in the Real Property Records of the county in which the property is located. Copies of the restrictive covenants and dedicatory instruments may be obtained from the county clerk.

You are obligated to pay assessments to the property owners' association. The amount of the assessments is subject to change. Your failure to pay the assessments could result in enforcement of the association's lien on and the foreclosure of your property.

Section 207.003, Property Code, entitles an owner to receive copies of any document that governs the establishment, maintenance, or operation of a subdivision, including, but not limited to, restrictions, bylaws, rules and regulations, and a resale certificate from a property owners' association. A resale certificate contains information including, but not limited to, statements specifying the amount and frequency of regular assessments and the style and cause number of lawsuits to which the property owners' association is a party, other than lawsuits relating to unpaid ad valorem taxes of an individual member of the association. These documents must be made available to you by the property owners' association or the association's agent on your request.

Date: __________

__________________________________

Signature of Purchaser

(a-1) The second paragraph of the notice prescribed by Subsection (a) must be in bold print and underlined.

(b) The seller shall deliver the notice to the purchaser before the date the executory contract binds the purchaser to purchase the property. The notice may be given separately, as part of the contract during negotiations, or as part of any other notice the seller delivers to the purchaser. If the notice is included as part of the executory contract or another notice, the title of the notice prescribed by this section, the references to the street address and date in the notice, and the purchaser's signature on the notice may be omitted.

(c) This section does not apply to a transfer:

(1) under a court order or foreclosure sale;

(2) by a trustee in bankruptcy;

(3) to a mortgagee by a mortgagor or successor in interest or to a beneficiary of a deed of trust by a trustor or successor in interest;

(4) by a mortgagee or a beneficiary under a deed of trust who has acquired the land at a sale conducted under a power of sale under a deed of trust or a sale under a court-ordered foreclosure or has acquired the land by a deed in lieu of foreclosure;

(5) by a fiduciary in the course of the administration of a decedent's estate, guardianship, conservatorship, or trust;

(6) from one co-owner to another co-owner of an undivided interest in the real property;

(7) to a spouse or a person in the lineal line of consanguinity of the seller;

(8) to or from a governmental entity;

(9) of only a mineral interest, leasehold interest, or security interest; or

(10) of a real property interest in a condominium.

(d) If an executory contract is entered into without the seller providing the notice required by this section, the purchaser may terminate the contract for any reason within the earlier of:

(1) seven days after the date the purchaser receives the notice; or

(2) the date the transfer occurs as provided by the executory contract.

(e) The purchaser's right to terminate the executory contract under Subsection (d) is the purchaser's exclusive remedy for the seller's failure to provide the notice required by this section.

(f) On the purchaser's request for a resale certificate from the property owners' association or the association's agent, the association or its agent shall promptly deliver a copy of the most recent resale certificate issued for the property under Chapter 207 so long as the resale certificate was prepared not earlier than the 60th day before the date the resale certificate is delivered to the purchaser and reflects any special assessments approved before and due after the resale certificate is delivered. If a resale certificate that meets the requirements of this subsection has not been issued for the property, the seller shall request the association or its agent to issue a resale certificate under Chapter 207, and the association or its agent shall promptly prepare and deliver a copy of the resale certificate to the purchaser.

(g) The purchaser shall pay the fee to the property owners' association or its agent for issuing the resale certificate unless otherwise agreed by the purchaser and seller of the property. The property owners' association may require payment before beginning the process of providing a resale certificate requested under Chapter 207 but may not process a payment for a resale certificate until the certificate is available for delivery. The association may not charge a fee if the certificate is not provided in the time prescribed by Section 207.003(a).

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2000.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1142 (H.B. 1821), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 5.013. SELLER'S DISCLOSURE OF LOCATION OF CONDITIONS UNDER SURFACE OF UNIMPROVED REAL PROPERTY. (a) A seller of unimproved real property to be used for residential purposes shall provide to the purchaser of the property a written notice disclosing the location of a transportation pipeline, including a pipeline for the transportation of natural gas, natural gas liquids, synthetic gas, liquefied petroleum gas, petroleum or a petroleum product, or a hazardous substance.

(b) The notice must state the information to the best of the seller's belief and knowledge as of the date the notice is completed and signed by the seller. If the information required to be disclosed is not known to the seller, the seller shall indicate that fact in the notice.

(c) The notice must be delivered by the seller on or before the effective date of an executory contract binding the purchaser to purchase the property. If a contract is entered without the seller providing the notice as required by this section, the purchaser may terminate the contract for any reason not later than the seventh day after the effective date of the contract.

(d) This section applies to any seller of unimproved real property, including a seller who is the developer of the property and who sells the property to others for resale.

(e) In this section, "hazardous substance" and "hazardous waste" have the meanings assigned by Section 361.003, Health and Safety Code.

(f) A seller is not required to give the notice if:

(1) the seller is obligated under an earnest money contract to furnish a title insurance commitment to the buyer prior to closing; and

(2) the buyer is entitled to terminate the contract if the buyer's objections to title as permitted by the contract are not cured by the seller prior to closing.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1239, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.010 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(95), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 5.014. NOTICE OF OBLIGATIONS RELATED TO PUBLIC IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT. (a) A person who proposes to sell or otherwise convey real property that is located in a public improvement district established under Subchapter A, Chapter 372, Local Government Code, or Chapter 382, Local Government Code, shall first give to the purchaser of the property the written notice prescribed by Subsection (a-1) or (a-2), as applicable.

(a-1) Except for the notice prescribed by Subsection (a-2), the notice required by Subsection (a) shall be executed by the seller and must, except as provided by Subsection (b), read as follows:

NOTICE OF OBLIGATION TO PAY IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT ASSESSMENT TO (insert name of municipality or county levying assessment), TEXAS

CONCERNING THE FOLLOWING PROPERTY

(insert property address)

As the purchaser of the real property described above, you are obligated to pay assessments to (insert name of municipality or county, as applicable), Texas, for the costs of a portion of a public improvement or services project (the "Authorized Improvements") undertaken for the benefit of the property within (insert name of public improvement district) (the "District") created under (insert Subchapter A, Chapter 372, Local Government Code, or Chapter 382, Local Government Code, as applicable).

AN ASSESSMENT HAS BEEN LEVIED AGAINST YOUR PROPERTY FOR THE AUTHORIZED IMPROVEMENTS, WHICH MAY BE PAID IN FULL AT ANY TIME. IF THE ASSESSMENT IS NOT PAID IN FULL, IT WILL BE DUE AND PAYABLE IN ANNUAL INSTALLMENTS THAT WILL VARY FROM YEAR TO YEAR DEPENDING ON THE AMOUNT OF INTEREST PAID, COLLECTION COSTS, ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS, AND DELINQUENCY COSTS.

The exact amount of the assessment may be obtained from (insert name of municipality or county, as applicable). The exact amount of each annual installment will be approved each year by (insert name of city council or county commissioners court, as applicable) in the annual service plan update for the district. More information about the assessments, including the amounts and due dates, may be obtained from (insert name of municipality or county, as applicable).

Your failure to pay any assessment or any annual installment may result in penalties and interest being added to what you owe or in a lien on and the foreclosure of your property.

The undersigned purchaser acknowledges receipt of this notice before the effective date of a binding contract for the purchase of the real property at the address described above.

Date: __________________ ________________________________

Signature of Purchaser

(a-2) For a district described by Section 372.0035, Local Government Code, the notice required by Subsection (a) shall be executed by the seller and must, except as provided by Subsection (b), read as follows:

NOTICE OF OBLIGATION TO PAY IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT ASSESSMENT TO (insert name of municipality levying assessment), TEXAS

CONCERNING THE FOLLOWING HOTEL PROPERTY

(insert property address)

As the purchaser of the real property described above, you are obligated to pay assessments to (insert name of municipality), Texas, for the costs of a portion of a public improvement or services project (the "Authorized Services") undertaken for the benefit of the property within (insert name of public improvement district) (the "District") created under Subchapter A, Chapter 372, Local Government Code.

AN ASSESSMENT HAS BEEN LEVIED AGAINST YOUR PROPERTY FOR THE AUTHORIZED SERVICES, WHICH MUST BE PAID IN FULL WITH EVERY PAYMENT BY THE HOTEL OF LOCAL HOTEL OCCUPANCY TAX REMITTANCES TO THE MUNICIPALITY. YOUR FAILURE TO PAY THE ASSESSMENT MAY RESULT IN PENALTIES AND INTEREST BEING ADDED TO WHAT YOU OWE, AND MAY INCLUDE THE PURSUIT OF ANY OTHER REMEDY THAT IS AUTHORIZED UNDER SECTION 372.0035(d), LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE.

Information about the calculation of the assessment may be obtained from (insert name of the municipality). The exact assessment rate will be approved each year by (insert name of city council) in the annual service plan update for the district. More information about the assessments, including the assessment rate and due dates, may be obtained from (insert name of municipality).

The undersigned purchaser acknowledges receipt of this notice before the effective date of a binding contract for the purchase of the real property at the address described above.

Date: __________________ ________________________________

Signature of Purchaser

(b) The seller or the municipality or county that created the public improvement district may provide additional information regarding the district in the notice prescribed by Subsection (a-1) or (a-2), including whether an assessment has been levied, the amount of the assessment, and the payment schedule for assessments.

(c) This section does not apply to a transfer:

(1) under a court order or foreclosure sale;

(2) by a trustee in bankruptcy;

(3) to a mortgagee by a mortgagor or successor in interest or to a beneficiary of a deed of trust by a trustor or successor in interest;

(4) by a mortgagee or a beneficiary under a deed of trust who has acquired the land at a sale conducted under a power of sale under a deed of trust or a sale under a court-ordered foreclosure or has acquired the land by a deed in lieu of foreclosure;

(5) by a fiduciary in the course of the administration of a decedent's estate, guardianship, conservatorship, or trust;

(6) from one co-owner to another co-owner of an undivided interest in the real property;

(7) to a spouse or a person in the lineal line of consanguinity of the seller;

(8) to or from a governmental entity; or

(9) of only a mineral interest, leasehold interest, or security interest.

(d) For the purposes of this section, a contract for the purchase and sale of real property having a performance period of less than six months is considered a sale requiring notice.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1085 (H.B. 1919), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2006.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 20.002, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 253 (H.B. 1543), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 5.0141. NOTICE REQUIRED BEFORE CONTRACT EXECUTION. (a) The notice required by Section 5.014 shall be given to the prospective purchaser before the execution of a binding contract of purchase and sale, either separately or as an addendum or paragraph of a purchase contract.

(b) In the event a contract of purchase and sale is entered into without the seller providing the notice, the purchaser is entitled to terminate the contract.

(c) If, however, the seller furnishes the notice at or before closing the purchase and sale contract and the purchaser elects to close even though the notice was not timely furnished before execution of the contract, it shall be conclusively presumed that the purchaser has waived all rights to terminate the contract under Subsection (b) or recover damages or other remedies or rights under Section 5.0145.

(d) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, Section 5.014, 5.0142, 5.0143, 5.0144, or 5.0145, all sellers, title companies, real estate brokers, and examining attorneys, and any agent, representative, or person acting on their behalf, are not liable for damages under Section 5.0145, or for any other damages to any person, for:

(1) failing to provide the notice to a purchaser before execution of a binding contract of purchase and sale or at or before the closing of the purchase and sale contract when the municipality or county has not filed the service plan as required by Section 372.013, Local Government Code; or

(2) unintentionally providing a notice that is not the correct notice under the circumstances before execution of a binding contract of purchase and sale, or at or before the closing of the purchase and sale contract.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 253 (H.B. 1543), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 5.0142. PURCHASER SIGNATURE REQUIRED. The purchaser shall sign the notice required by Section 5.014 or the purchase contract including the notice to evidence the receipt of notice.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 253 (H.B. 1543), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 5.0143. RECORDING OF NOTICE AT CLOSING. At the closing of purchase and sale, a separate copy of the notice required by Section 5.014 with current information shall be executed by the seller and purchaser, acknowledged, and recorded in the deed records of the county in which the property is located.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 253 (H.B. 1543), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 5.0144. RELIANCE ON FILED SERVICE PLAN. (a) For the purposes of the notice required by Section 5.014, all sellers, title companies, real estate brokers, and examining attorneys, and any agent, representative, or person acting on their behalf, are entitled to rely on the accuracy of the service plan as last filed by each municipality or county under Section 372.013, Local Government Code, in completing the notice form to be executed by the seller and purchaser at the closing of purchase and sale.

(b) Any information taken from the service plan as last filed by the municipality or county and the information contained in or shown on the notice form contained in the service plan under Section 372.013, Local Government Code, not including information provided as to the assessments or annual installment amounts as authorized by Section 5.014(b), shall be, for purposes of the notice required by Section 5.014, conclusively presumed as a matter of law to be correct.

(c) All subsequent sellers, purchasers, title insurance companies, real estate brokers, examining attorneys, and lienholders are entitled to rely on the service plan filed by the municipality or county, including the notice form contained in the service plan, under Section 372.013, Local Government Code.

(d) If the notice required by Section 5.014 is given at closing as provided by Section 5.0141(c), a purchaser, or the purchaser's heirs, successors, or assigns, are not entitled to maintain an action for damages against a seller, title insurance company, real estate broker, or lienholder, or any agent, representative, or person acting on their behalf, because the seller:

(1) used the notice form included in the service plan filed by the municipality or county under Section 372.013, Local Government Code; or

(2) relied on the filed legal description of the public improvement district in determining whether the property is located in the district.

(e) No action may be maintained against any title company for failure to disclose the inclusion of the property in a public improvement district when the municipality or county has not filed the service plan under Section 372.013, Local Government Code, with the clerk of each county in which the district is located.

(f) All sellers, title insurance companies, examining attorneys, vendors of property and tax information, real estate brokers, and lienholders, and any agent, representative, or person acting on their behalf, are entitled to rely on the accuracy of:

(1) the service plan last filed by the municipality or county or the information in the notice form filed by the district under Section 372.013, Local Government Code; or

(2) for the purposes of the notice required by Section 5.014, the information in the service plan filed by the municipality or county in effect as of January 1 of each year for the period January 1 through December 31 of such calendar year.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 253 (H.B. 1543), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 5.0145. SUITS FOR DAMAGES. (a) If any sale or conveyance of real property within a public improvement district is not made in compliance with Section 5.014, 5.0141, 5.0142, or 5.0143, the purchaser may institute a suit for damages under the provisions of Subsection (b) or (e).

(b) A purchaser of real property whose sale or conveyance is subject to the notice requirement under Section 5.014, if the sale or conveyance of the property is not made in compliance with that section or Section 5.0141, 5.0142, or 5.0143, may institute a suit for damages in the amount of all costs relative to the purchase of the property at the time of purchase, plus interest and reasonable attorney's fees.

(c) The suit for damages under Subsection (b) may be instituted jointly or severally against the person, firm, corporation, partnership, organization, business trust, estate, trust, association, or other legal entity that sold or conveyed the property to the purchaser.

(d) Following the recovery of damages under Subsection (b), the amount of the damages shall first be paid to satisfy all unpaid obligations on each outstanding lien on the property and the remainder of the damage amount shall be paid to the purchaser. On payment of all damages respectively to the lienholders and purchaser, the purchaser shall reconvey the property to the seller.

(e) A purchaser of real property whose sale or conveyance is subject to the notice requirement under Section 5.014, if the sale or conveyance of the property is not made in compliance with that section or Section 5.0141, 5.0142, or 5.0143, may institute a suit for damages in an amount not to exceed $5,000, plus reasonable attorney's fees.

(f) A purchaser is not entitled to recover damages under both Subsections (b) and (e), and entry of a final decision awarding damages to the purchaser under either Subsection (b) or (e) shall preclude the purchaser from recovering damages under the other subsection.

(g) The relief provided under Subsections (b) and (e) shall be the exclusive remedies for a purchaser aggrieved by the seller's failure to comply with the provisions of Section 5.014, 5.0141, 5.0142, or 5.0143.

(h) An action for damages does not apply to, affect, alter, or impair the validity of any existing vendor's lien, mechanic's lien, or deed of trust lien on the property.

(i) A suit for damages under this section must be brought not later than the earlier of:

(1) the 90th day after the date the purchaser receives the first public improvement district annual assessment installment or tax notice; or

(2) the fourth anniversary of the date the property is sold or conveyed to the purchaser.

(j) Notwithstanding a provision of this section, a purchaser may not recover damages under this section if the purchaser:

(1) purchases an equity in real property and in conjunction with the purchase assumes any liens, whether purchase money or otherwise; and

(2) does not require proof of title by abstract, title policy, or any other proof of title.

(k) A purchaser who purchases real property in a public improvement district and who then sells or conveys the property shall on closing of the subsequent sale or conveyance be conclusively considered to have waived any prior right to damages under this section.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 253 (H.B. 1543), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 5.015. PROHIBITED FEES. A person who has a right of first refusal in real property that is a condominium subject to Chapter 81 or Chapter 82 may not charge a fee for declining to exercise that right, such as a fee for providing written evidence of the declination.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 825 (S.B. 810), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Property Code, Section 5.014 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(63), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 5.016. CONVEYANCE OF RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY ENCUMBERED BY LIEN. (a) A person may not convey an interest in or enter into a contract to convey an interest in residential real property that will be encumbered by a recorded lien at the time the interest is conveyed unless, on or before the seventh day before the earlier of the effective date of the conveyance or the execution of an executory contract binding the purchaser to purchase the property, an option contract, or other contract, the person provides the purchaser and each lienholder a separate written disclosure statement in at least 12-point type that:

(1) identifies the property and includes the name, address, and phone number of each lienholder;

(2) states the amount of the debt that is secured by each lien;

(3) specifies the terms of any contract or law under which the debt that is secured by the lien was incurred, including, as applicable:

(A) the rate of interest;

(B) the periodic installments required to be paid; and

(C) the account number;

(4) indicates whether the lienholder has consented to the transfer of the property to the purchaser;

(5) specifies the details of any insurance policy relating to the property, including:

(A) the name of the insurer and insured;

(B) the amount for which the property is insured; and

(C) the property that is insured;

(6) states the amount of any property taxes that are due on the property; and

(7) includes a statement at the top of the disclosure in a form substantially similar to the following:

WARNING: ONE OR MORE RECORDED LIENS HAVE BEEN FILED THAT MAKE A CLAIM AGAINST THIS PROPERTY AS LISTED BELOW. IF A LIEN IS NOT RELEASED AND THE PROPERTY IS CONVEYED WITHOUT THE CONSENT OF THE LIENHOLDER, IT IS POSSIBLE THE LIENHOLDER COULD DEMAND FULL PAYMENT OF THE OUTSTANDING BALANCE OF THE LIEN IMMEDIATELY. YOU MAY WISH TO CONTACT EACH LIENHOLDER FOR FURTHER INFORMATION AND DISCUSS THIS MATTER WITH AN ATTORNEY.

(b) A violation of this section does not invalidate a conveyance. Except as provided by Subsections (c) and (d), if a contract is entered into without the seller providing the notice required by this section, the purchaser may terminate the contract for any reason on or before the seventh day after the date the purchaser receives the notice in addition to other remedies provided by this section or other law.

(c) This section does not apply to a transfer:

(1) under a court order or foreclosure sale;

(2) by a trustee in bankruptcy;

(3) to a mortgagee by a mortgagor or successor in interest or to a beneficiary of a deed of trust by a trustor or successor in interest;

(4) by a mortgagee or a beneficiary under a deed of trust who has acquired the real property at a sale conducted under a power of sale under a deed of trust or a sale under a court-ordered foreclosure or has acquired the real property by a deed in lieu of foreclosure;

(5) by a fiduciary in the course of the administration of a decedent's estate, guardianship, conservatorship, or trust;

(6) from one co-owner to one or more other co-owners;

(7) to a spouse or to a person or persons in the lineal line of consanguinity of one or more of the transferors;

(8) between spouses resulting from a decree of dissolution of marriage or a decree of legal separation or from a property settlement agreement incidental to one of those decrees;

(9) to or from a governmental entity;

(10) where the purchaser obtains a title insurance policy insuring the transfer of title to the real property; or

(11) to a person who has purchased, conveyed, or entered into contracts to purchase or convey an interest in real property four or more times in the preceding 12 months.

(d) A violation of this section is not actionable if the person required to give notice reasonably believes and takes any necessary action to ensure that each lien for which notice was not provided will be released on or before the 30th day after the date on which title to the property is transferred.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1056 (H.B. 2207), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2008.

Sec. 5.019. NOTICE OF WATER LEVEL FLUCTUATIONS. (a) This section applies only to the sale of residential or commercial real property adjoining an impoundment of water, including a reservoir or lake, constructed and maintained under Chapter 11, Water Code, that has a storage capacity of at least 5,000 acre-feet at the impoundment's normal operating level.

(b) A seller of real property shall give to the purchaser of the property a written notice in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF WATER LEVEL FLUCTUATIONS

The water level of the impoundment of water adjoining the property at ______________ (street address and city) or described as ______________ (legal description) fluctuates for various reasons, including as a result of:

(1) an entity lawfully exercising its right to use the water stored in the impoundment; or

(2) drought or flood conditions.

(c) The notice described by Subsection (b) shall be delivered by the seller to the purchaser on or before the effective date of an executory contract binding the purchaser to purchase the property.

(d) If a contract is entered into without the seller providing the notice within the period required by Subsection (c), the purchaser may terminate the contract for any reason within seven days after the date the purchaser receives:

(1) the notice described by Subsection (b) from the seller; or

(2) information described by the notice under Subsection (b) from any other person.

(e) After the date of the conveyance, the purchaser may bring an action for misrepresentation against the seller if the seller:

(1) failed to provide the notice before the date of the conveyance; and

(2) had actual knowledge that the water level described by Subsection (b) fluctuates for various reasons, including the reasons stated in Subsection (b).

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 926 (H.B. 1665), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 5.020. EASEMENTS RESTRICTING POSSESSION OF FIREARMS OR ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES PROHIBITED. (a) In this section:

(1) "Alcoholic beverage" has the meaning assigned by Section 1.04, Alcoholic Beverage Code.

(2) "Firearm" has the meaning assigned by Section 46.01, Penal Code. The term includes any firearm parts, firearm accessories, and firearm ammunition.

(b) This section does not apply to a right-of-way easement for a pipeline, electric transmission line, or other utility.

(c) An instrument granting an access easement may not restrict or prohibit an easement holder or an easement holder's guest from possessing, carrying, or transporting a firearm or an alcoholic beverage over the servient estate while using the easement for the easement's purpose.

(d) The owner of a servient estate may not enforce a restrictive covenant in an instrument granting an access easement over the servient estate that restricts or prohibits the easement holder or the easement holder's guest from possessing, carrying, or transporting a firearm or an alcoholic beverage over the servient estate while using the easement for the easement's purpose.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 907 (H.B. 4346), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 5.0205. EQUITABLE INTEREST DISCLOSURE. Before entering into a contract to sell an option or assign an interest in a contract to purchase real property, a person must disclose in writing to:

(1) any potential buyer that the person is selling only an option or assigning an interest in a contract and that the person does not have legal title to the real property; and

(2) the owner of the real property that the person intends to sell an option or assign an interest in a contract.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 974 (S.B. 2212), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2017.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Property Code, Section 5.086 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 94 (S.B. 1577), Sec. 27, eff. January 1, 2024.

SUBCHAPTER B. FORM AND CONSTRUCTION OF INSTRUMENTS

Sec. 5.021. INSTRUMENT OF CONVEYANCE. A conveyance of an estate of inheritance, a freehold, or an estate for more than one year, in land and tenements, must be in writing and must be subscribed and delivered by the conveyor or by the conveyor's agent authorized in writing.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3481, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 5.022. FORM. (a) The following form or a form that is the same in substance conveys a fee simple estate in real property with a covenant of general warranty:

"The State of Texas,

"County of ____________________.

"Know all men by these presents, That I, __________________, of the __________________ (give name of city, town, or county), in the state aforesaid, for and in consideration of __________________ dollars, to me in hand paid by __________________, have granted, sold, and conveyed, and by these presents do grant, sell, and convey unto the said __________________, of the __________________ (give name of city, town, or county), in the state of __________________, all that certain __________________ (describe the premises). To have and to hold the above described premises, together with all and singular the rights and appurtenances thereto in any wise belonging, unto the said __________________, his heirs or assigns forever. And I do hereby bind myself, my heirs, executors, and administrators to warrant and forever defend all and singular the said premises unto the said __________________, his heirs, and assigns, against every person whomsoever, lawfully claiming or to claim the same, or any part thereof.

"Witness my hand, this __________________ day of __________________, A.D. 19___.

"Signed and delivered in the presence of ____________________"

(b) A covenant of warranty is not required in a conveyance.

(c) The parties to a conveyance may insert any clause or use any form not in contravention of law.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3481, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 5.023. IMPLIED COVENANTS. (a) Unless the conveyance expressly provides otherwise, the use of "grant" or "convey" in a conveyance of an estate of inheritance or fee simple implies only that the grantor and the grantor's heirs covenant to the grantee and the grantee's heirs or assigns:

(1) that prior to the execution of the conveyance the grantor has not conveyed the estate or any interest in the estate to a person other than the grantee; and

(2) that at the time of the execution of the conveyance the estate is free from encumbrances.

(b) An implied covenant under this section may be the basis for a lawsuit as if it had been expressed in the conveyance.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3482, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 5.024. ENCUMBRANCES. "Encumbrance" includes a tax, an assessment, and a lien on real property.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3482, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 5.025. WOOD SHINGLE ROOF. To the extent that a deed restriction applicable to a structure on residential property requires the use of a wood shingle roof, the restriction is void.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3482, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 5.026. DISCRIMINATORY PROVISIONS. (a) If a restriction that affects real property, or a provision in a deed that conveys real property or an interest in real property, whether express or incorporated by reference, prohibits the use by or the sale, lease, or transfer to a person because of race, color, religion, or national origin, the provision or restriction is void.

(b) A court shall dismiss a suit or part of a suit to enforce a provision that is void under this section.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3483, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 5.0261. REMOVAL OF DISCRIMINATORY PROVISION FROM RECORDED CONVEYANCE INSTRUMENT. (a) In this section, "discriminatory provision" means a restriction or provision that is void under Section 5.026(a).

(b) A person who owns real property or an interest in real property the chain of title for which includes a recorded conveyance instrument containing a discriminatory provision, or another person with the permission of the owner, may request the removal of the discriminatory provision from the instrument by completing and filing, with the clerk of a district court in the county in whose real property records the instrument is recorded or of another court having jurisdiction over real property matters in the county, a motion, verified by affidavit by a completed form for ordinary certificate of acknowledgment of the same type described by Section 121.007, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, that contains, at a minimum, the information in the following suggested form:

MISC. DOCKET NO. ______

In Re: Conveyance Instrument

In the ______ Judicial District

with Discriminatory

In and For ___________________

Provision County, Texas

Motion for Judicial Review of Conveyance Instrument Alleged to Contain a Discriminatory Provision as Defined by Section 5.0261(a), Texas Property Code

Now Comes (name) and files this motion requesting a judicial determination of the status of a conveyance instrument that contains a discriminatory provision as defined by Section 5.0261(a), Texas Property Code, filed in the office of the Clerk of (county name) County, Texas, and in support of the motion would show the court as follows:

I.

(Name), movant herein, is the person who owns the real property or the interest in real property described in the conveyance instrument or has been given permission by that person to file this motion.

II.

On (date), in the exercise of the county clerk's official duties as County Clerk of (county name) County, Texas, the county clerk received and filed and recorded the conveyance instrument attached hereto and containing (number) pages. The instrument is recorded at _______ in the real property records of _______ County. The conveyance instrument contains a discriminatory provision as defined by Section 5.0261(a), Texas Property Code.

III.

Movant alleges that the conveyance instrument attached hereto contains a discriminatory provision as defined by Section 5.0261(a), Texas Property Code, and that the discriminatory provision should be removed.

IV.

Movant attests that assertions herein are true and correct.

V.

PRAYER

Movant requests the court to review the attached conveyance instrument and enter an order removing the discriminatory provision as defined by Section 5.0261(a), Texas Property Code, together with such other orders as the court deems appropriate.

Respectfully submitted,

_________________________

(Signature and typed name and address)

(c) The completed form for ordinary certificate of acknowledgment, of the same type described by Section 121.007, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, must be as follows:

AFFIDAVIT

THE STATE OF TEXAS

COUNTY OF ______________

BEFORE ME, the undersigned authority, personally appeared _____________, who, being by me duly sworn, deposed as follows:

"My name is _________________. I am over 21 years of age, of sound mind, with personal knowledge of the following facts, and fully competent to testify.

I further attest that the assertions contained in the accompanying motion are true and correct."

Further affiant sayeth not.

_____________________________

SUBSCRIBED and SWORN TO before

me, this _____ day of ________,

_____.

_____________________________

NOTARY PUBLIC, State of Texas

Notary's printed name:

_____________________________

My commission expires:

_____________________________

_____________________________

(d) A motion under this section may be ruled on by a court having jurisdiction over real property matters in the county where the subject conveyance instrument was filed. The court's finding may be made solely on a review of the conveyance instrument attached to the motion and without hearing any testimonial evidence. The court's review may be made ex parte without delay or notice of any kind. If the court does not rule on the motion on or before the 15th day after the date the motion is filed, the motion is deemed granted. An appellate court shall expedite review of a court's finding under this section.

(e) A court clerk may not collect a filing fee for filing a motion under this section.

(f) After reviewing the conveyance instrument attached to a motion filed under this section, the court shall enter an appropriate finding of fact and conclusion of law.

(g) The court's finding of fact and conclusion of law must be:

(1) transferred by the court clerk to the county clerk for recording and indexing not later than the 10th day after the date the finding of fact and conclusion of law is entered by the court or deemed granted under Subsection (d); and

(2) filed and indexed by the county clerk in the same class of records in which the subject conveyance instrument is filed.

(h) The county clerk may not collect a fee for filing a court's finding of fact and conclusion of law under this section.

(i) A suggested form of order appropriate to comply with Subsection (f) is as follows:

MISC. DOCKET NO. ______

In Re: Conveyance Instrument

In the ______ Judicial District

with Discriminatory In and For ___________________

Provision County, Texas

Judicial Finding of Fact and Conclusion of Law Regarding Conveyance Instrument Alleged to Contain a Discriminatory Provision as Defined by Section 5.0261(a), Texas Property Code

On the (number) day of (month), (year), in the above entitled and numbered cause, this court reviewed a motion, verified by affidavit, of (name) and the conveyance instrument attached thereto. No testimony was taken from any party, nor was there any notice of the court's review, the court having made the determination that a decision could be made solely on review of the conveyance instrument under the authority vested in the court under Section 5.0261, Texas Property Code.

The court finds as follows (only an item checked and initialed is a valid court ruling):

_______ The conveyance instrument recorded at ______ in the real property records of ______ County CONTAINS a discriminatory provision as defined by Section 5.0261(a), Texas Property Code. The discriminatory provision as defined by Section 5.0261(a), Texas Property Code, is void and removed from the conveyance instrument identified herein.

_______ The conveyance instrument recorded at ______ in the real property records of ______ County and attached to the motion herein DOES NOT CONTAIN a discriminatory provision as defined by Section 5.0261(a), Texas Property Code.

This court expressly limits its finding of fact and conclusion of law to the review of a ministerial act. The county clerk shall file this finding of fact and conclusion of law in the same class of records in which the subject conveyance instrument is filed, and the court directs the county clerk to index it using the same names used to index the subject conveyance instrument.

SIGNED ON THIS THE ________ DAY OF ____________________.

_______________________________

JUDGE

________ (Court)

_____________ COUNTY, TEXAS

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 532 (S.B. 30), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 5.027. CORRECTION INSTRUMENTS: GENERALLY. (a) A correction instrument that complies with Section 5.028 or 5.029 may correct an ambiguity or error in a recorded original instrument of conveyance to transfer real property or an interest in real property, including an ambiguity or error that relates to the description of or extent of the interest conveyed.

(b) A correction instrument may not correct an ambiguity or error in a recorded original instrument of conveyance to transfer real property or an interest in real property not originally conveyed in the instrument of conveyance for purposes of a sale of real property under a power of sale under Chapter 51 unless the conveyance otherwise complies with all requirements of Chapter 51.

(c) A correction instrument is subject to Section 13.001.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 1496), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 5.028. CORRECTION INSTRUMENTS: NONMATERIAL CORRECTIONS. (a) A person who has personal knowledge of facts relevant to the correction of a recorded original instrument of conveyance may prepare or execute a correction instrument to make a nonmaterial change that results from a clerical error, including:

(1) a correction of an inaccurate or incorrect element in a legal description, such as a distance, angle, direction, bearing or chord, a reference to a plat or other plat information, a lot or block number, a unit, building designation, or section number, an appurtenant easement, a township name or number, a municipality, county, or state name, a range number or meridian, a certified survey map number, or a subdivision or condominium name; or

(2) an addition, correction, or clarification of:

(A) a party's name, including the spelling of a name, a first or middle name or initial, a suffix, an alternate name by which a party is known, the identity of the trustee of a trust named as party, or a description of an entity as a corporation, company, or other type of organization;

(B) a party's marital status;

(C) the date on which the conveyance was executed;

(D) the recording data for an instrument referenced in the correction instrument; or

(E) a fact relating to the acknowledgment or authentication.

(a-1) A person who has personal knowledge of facts relevant to the correction of a recorded original instrument of conveyance may prepare or execute a correction instrument to make a nonmaterial change that results from an inadvertent error, including the addition, correction, or clarification of:

(1) a legal description prepared in connection with the preparation of the original instrument but inadvertently omitted from the original instrument; or

(2) an omitted call in a metes and bounds legal description in the original instrument that completes the description of the property.

(b) A person who executes a correction instrument under this section may execute a correction instrument that provides an acknowledgment or authentication that is required and was not included in the recorded original instrument of conveyance.

(c) A person who executes a correction instrument under this section shall disclose in the instrument the basis for the person's personal knowledge of the facts relevant to the correction of the recorded original instrument of conveyance.

(d) A person who executes a correction instrument under this section shall:

(1) record the instrument and evidence of notice as provided by Subdivision (2), if applicable, in each county in which the original instrument of conveyance being corrected is recorded; and

(2) if the correction instrument is not signed by each party to the recorded original instrument, send a copy of the correction instrument and notice by first class mail, e-mail, or other reasonable means to each party to the original instrument of conveyance and, if applicable, a party's heirs, successors, or assigns.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 1496), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 158 (S.B. 887), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 345 (S.B. 801), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 5.029. CORRECTION INSTRUMENTS: MATERIAL CORRECTIONS. (a) In addition to nonmaterial corrections, including the corrections described by Section 5.028, the parties to the original transaction or the parties' heirs, successors, or assigns, as applicable may execute a correction instrument to make a material correction to the recorded original instrument of conveyance, including a correction to:

(1) add:

(A) a buyer's disclaimer of an interest in the real property that is the subject of the original instrument of conveyance;

(B) a mortgagee's consent or subordination to a recorded document executed by the mortgagee or an heir, successor, or assign of the mortgagee; or

(C) land to a conveyance that correctly conveys other land;

(2) remove land from a conveyance that correctly conveys other land; or

(3) accurately identify a lot or unit number or letter of property owned by the grantor that was inaccurately identified as another lot or unit number or letter of property owned by the grantor in the recorded original instrument of conveyance.

(b) A correction instrument under this section must be:

(1) executed by each party to the recorded original instrument of conveyance the correction instrument is executed to correct or, if applicable, a party's heirs, successors, or assigns; and

(2) recorded in each county in which the original instrument of conveyance that is being corrected is recorded.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 1496), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 5.030. CORRECTION INSTRUMENT: EFFECT. (a) A correction instrument that complies with Section 5.028 or 5.029 is:

(1) effective as of the effective date of the recorded original instrument of conveyance;

(2) prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the correction instrument;

(3) presumed to be true;

(4) subject to rebuttal; and

(5) notice to a subsequent buyer of the facts stated in the correction instrument.

(b) A correction instrument replaces and is a substitute for the original instrument. Except as provided by Subsection (c), a bona fide purchaser of property that is subject to a correction instrument may rely on the instrument against any person making an adverse or inconsistent claim.

(c) A correction instrument is subject to the property interest of a creditor or a subsequent purchaser for valuable consideration without notice acquired on or after the date the original instrument was acknowledged, sworn to, or proved and filed for record as required by law and before the correction instrument has been acknowledged, sworn to, or proved and filed for record as required by law.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 1496), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 158 (S.B. 887), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 5.031. CORRECTION INSTRUMENTS RECORDED BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2011. A correction instrument recorded before September 1, 2011, that substantially complies with Section 5.028 or 5.029 and that purports to correct a recorded original instrument of conveyance is effective to the same extent as provided by Section 5.030 unless a court of competent jurisdiction renders a final judgment determining that the correction instrument does not substantially comply with Section 5.028 or 5.029.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 1496), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER C. FUTURE ESTATES

Sec. 5.041. FUTURE ESTATES. A person may make an inter vivos conveyance of an estate of freehold or inheritance that commences in the future, in the same manner as by a will.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3483, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 5.042. ABOLITION OF COMMON-LAW RULES. (a) The common-law rules known as the rule in Shelley's case, the rule forbidding a remainder to the grantor's heirs, the doctrine of worthier title, and the doctrine or rule prohibiting an existing lien upon part of a homestead from extending to another part of the homestead not charged with the debts secured by the existing lien upon part of the homestead do not apply in this state.

(b) A deed, will, or other conveyance of property in this state that limits an interest in the property to a particular person or to a class such as the heirs, heirs of the body, issue, or next of kin of the conveyor or of a person to whom a particular interest in the same property is limited is effective according to the intent of the conveyor.

(c) Status as an heir or next of kin of a conveyor or the failure of a conveyor to describe a person in a conveyance other than as a member of a class does not affect a person's right to take or share in an interest as a conveyee.

(d) Subject to the intention of a conveyor, which controls unless limited by law, the membership of a class described in this section and the participation of a member in a property interest conveyed to the class are determined under this state's laws of descent and distribution.

(e) This section does not apply to a conveyance taking effect before January 1, 1964.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3483, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1510, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 5.043. REFORMATION OF INTERESTS VIOLATING RULE AGAINST PERPETUITIES. (a) Within the limits of the rule against perpetuities, a court shall reform or construe an interest in real or personal property that violates the rule to effect the ascertainable general intent of the creator of the interest. A court shall liberally construe and apply this provision to validate an interest to the fullest extent consistent with the creator's intent.

(b) The court may reform or construe an interest under Subsection (a) of this section according to the doctrine of cy pres by giving effect to the general intent and specific directives of the creator within the limits of the rule against perpetuities.

(c) If an instrument that violates the rule against perpetuities may be reformed or construed under this section, a court shall enforce the provisions of the instrument that do not violate the rule and shall reform or construe under this section a provision that violates or might violate the rule.

(d) This section applies to legal and equitable interests, including noncharitable gifts and trusts, conveyed by an inter vivos instrument or a will that takes effect on or after September 1, 1969, and this section applies to an appointment made on or after that date regardless of when the power was created.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3484, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 895, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

SUBCHAPTER D. EXECUTORY CONTRACT FOR CONVEYANCE

Sec. 5.061. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "default" means the failure to:

(1) make a timely payment; or

(2) comply with a term of an executory contract.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 994, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.065 and amended by Act 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 5.062. APPLICABILITY. (a) This subchapter applies only to a transaction involving an executory contract for conveyance of real property used or to be used as the purchaser's residence or as the residence of a person related to the purchaser within the second degree by consanguinity or affinity, as determined under Chapter 573, Government Code. For purposes of this subchapter, and only for the purposes of this subchapter:

(1) a lot measuring one acre or less is presumed to be residential property; and

(2) an option to purchase real property that includes or is combined or executed concurrently with a residential lease agreement, together with the lease, is considered an executory contract for conveyance of real property.

(b) This subchapter does not apply to the following transactions under an executory contract:

(1) the sale of state land; or

(2) a sale of land by:

(A) the Veterans' Land Board;

(B) this state or a political subdivision of this state; or

(C) an instrumentality, public corporation, or other entity created to act on behalf of this state or a political subdivision of this state, including an entity created under Chapter 303, 392, or 394, Local Government Code.

(c) This subchapter does not apply to an executory contract that provides for the delivery of a deed from the seller to the purchaser within 180 days of the date of the final execution of the executory contract.

(d) Section 5.066 and Sections 5.068-5.080 do not apply to a transaction involving an executory contract for conveyance if the purchaser of the property:

(1) is related to the seller of the property within the second degree by consanguinity or affinity, as determined under Chapter 573, Government Code; and

(2) has waived the applicability of those sections in a written agreement.

(e) Sections 5.066, 5.067, 5.071, 5.075, 5.079, 5.081, and 5.082 do not apply to an executory contract described by Subsection (a)(2).

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, only the following sections apply to an executory contract described by Subsection (a)(2) if the term of the contract is three years or less and the purchaser and seller, or the purchaser's or seller's assignee, agent, or affiliate, have not been parties to an executory contract to purchase the property covered by the executory contract for longer than three years:

(1) Sections 5.063-5.065;

(2) Section 5.073, except for Section 5.073(a)(2); and

(3) Sections 5.083 and 5.085.

(g) Except as provided by Subsection (b), if Subsection (f) conflicts with another provision of this subchapter, Subsection (f) prevails.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 994, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.091 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 978 (H.B. 1823), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 996 (H.B. 311), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 5.0621. CONSTRUCTION WITH OTHER LAW. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the provisions of this subchapter and Chapter 92 apply to the portion of an executory contract described by Section 5.062(a)(2) that is a residential lease agreement.

(b) After a tenant exercises an option to purchase leased property under a residential lease described by Subsection (a), Chapter 92 no longer applies to the lease.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 978 (H.B. 1823), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 5.0622. ADDITIONAL APPLICABILITY: CERTAIN COUNTIES. (a) This section applies only to a county with a population of less than 100,000 that is located in a metropolitan statistical area as defined by the federal Office of Management and Budget:

(1) with a population of more than 1.5 million; and

(2) adjacent to a different metropolitan statistical area as defined by the federal Office of Management and Budget with a population of more than 2.5 million.

(b) The commissioners court of a county may adopt an order requiring an executory contract for the conveyance of land used or to be used as a residence located in the county to be subject to this subchapter. The order must specify a method for determining whether the land is used or to be used as a residence.

(c) The order may not include an executory contract for the conveyance of land:

(1) described by Section 5.062(b), (c), or (d); or

(2) that is to be used primarily for agricultural use, as defined by Section 1-d, Article VIII, Texas Constitution, or for farm, ranch, wildlife management, or timber production use within the meaning of Section 1-d-1, Article VIII, Texas Constitution, and for which no part of the land is to be used as a residence.

(d) If a tract described by Subsection (c)(2) ceases to be used primarily for agricultural use or for farm, ranch, wildlife management, or timber production use, or any part of the land is used as a residence, the executory contract for the conveyance of the land may be included in an order authorized by this section.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 911 (H.B. 4374), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 209, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 5.063. NOTICE. (a) Notice under Section 5.064 must be in writing and must be delivered by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested. The notice must be conspicuous and printed in 14-point boldface type or 14-point uppercase typewritten letters, and must include on a separate page the statement:

NOTICE

YOU ARE NOT COMPLYING WITH THE TERMS OF THE CONTRACT TO BUY YOUR PROPERTY. UNLESS YOU TAKE THE ACTION SPECIFIED IN THIS NOTICE BY (date) THE SELLER HAS THE RIGHT TO TAKE POSSESSION OF YOUR PROPERTY.

(b) The notice must also:

(1) identify and explain the remedy the seller intends to enforce;

(2) if the purchaser has failed to make a timely payment, specify:

(A) the delinquent amount, itemized into principal and interest;

(B) any additional charges claimed, such as late charges or attorney's fees; and

(C) the period to which the delinquency and additional charges relate; and

(3) if the purchaser has failed to comply with a term of the contract, identify the term violated and the action required to cure the violation.

(c) Notice by mail is given when it is mailed to the purchaser's residence or place of business. The affidavit of a person knowledgeable of the facts to the effect that notice was given is prima facie evidence of notice in an action involving a subsequent bona fide purchaser for value if the purchaser is not in possession of the real property and if the stated time to avoid the forfeiture has expired. A bona fide subsequent purchaser for value who relies upon the affidavit under this subsection shall take title free and clear of the contract.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3485, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 444, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 994, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.062 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 5.064. SELLER'S REMEDIES ON DEFAULT. A seller may enforce the remedy of rescission or of forfeiture and acceleration against a purchaser in default under an executory contract for conveyance of real property only if:

(1) the seller notifies the purchaser of:

(A) the seller's intent to enforce a remedy under this section; and

(B) the purchaser's right to cure the default within the 30-day period described by Section 5.065;

(2) the purchaser fails to cure the default within the 30-day period described by Section 5.065;

(3) Section 5.066 does not apply; and

(4) the contract has not been recorded in the county in which the property is located.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3484, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 994, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.061 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 996 (H.B. 311), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 5.065. RIGHT TO CURE DEFAULT. Notwithstanding an agreement to the contrary, a purchaser in default under an executory contract for the conveyance of real property may avoid the enforcement of a remedy described by Section 5.064 by complying with the terms of the contract on or before the 30th day after the date notice is given under that section.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3485, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 994, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.063 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 5.066. EQUITY PROTECTION; SALE OF PROPERTY. (a) If a purchaser defaults after the purchaser has paid 40 percent or more of the amount due or the equivalent of 48 monthly payments under the executory contract or, regardless of the amount the purchaser has paid, the executory contract has been recorded, the seller is granted the power to sell, through a trustee designated by the seller, the purchaser's interest in the property as provided by this section. The seller may not enforce the remedy of rescission or of forfeiture and acceleration after the contract has been recorded.

(b) The seller shall notify a purchaser of a default under the contract and allow the purchaser at least 60 days after the date notice is given to cure the default. The notice must be provided as prescribed by Section 5.063 except that the notice must substitute the following statement:

NOTICE

YOU ARE NOT COMPLYING WITH THE TERMS OF THE CONTRACT TO BUY YOUR PROPERTY. UNLESS YOU TAKE THE ACTION SPECIFIED IN THIS NOTICE BY (date) A TRUSTEE DESIGNATED BY THE SELLER HAS THE RIGHT TO SELL YOUR PROPERTY AT A PUBLIC AUCTION.

(c) The trustee or a substitute trustee designated by the seller must post, file, and serve a notice of sale and the county clerk shall record and maintain the notice of sale as prescribed by Section 51.002. A notice of sale is not valid unless it is given after the period to cure has expired.

(d) The trustee or a substitute trustee designated by the seller must conduct the sale as prescribed by Section 51.002. The seller must:

(1) convey to a purchaser at a sale conducted under this section fee simple title to the real property; and

(2) warrant that the property is free from any encumbrance.

(e) The remaining balance of the amount due under the executory contract is the debt for purposes of a sale under this section. If the proceeds of the sale exceed the debt amount, the seller shall disburse the excess funds to the purchaser under the executory contract. If the proceeds of the sale are insufficient to extinguish the debt amount, the seller's right to recover the resulting deficiency is subject to Sections 51.003, 51.004, and 51.005 unless a provision of the executory contract releases the purchaser under the contract from liability.

(f) The affidavit of a person knowledgeable of the facts that states that the notice was given and the sale was conducted as provided by this section is prima facie evidence of those facts. A purchaser for value who relies on an affidavit under this subsection acquires title to the property free and clear of the executory contract.

(g) If a purchaser defaults before the purchaser has paid 40 percent of the amount due or the equivalent of 48 monthly payments under the executory contract, the seller may enforce the remedy of rescission or of forfeiture and acceleration of the indebtedness if the seller complies with the notice requirements of Sections 5.063 and 5.064.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 994, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.101 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 996 (H.B. 311), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 5.067. PLACEMENT OF LIEN FOR UTILITY SERVICE. Notwithstanding any terms of a contract to the contrary, the placement of a lien for the reasonable value of improvements to residential real estate for purposes of providing utility service to the property shall not constitute a default under the terms of an executory contract for the purchase of the real property.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 743, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 994, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.064 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 5.068. FOREIGN LANGUAGE REQUIREMENT. If the negotiations that precede the execution of an executory contract are conducted primarily in a language other than English, the seller shall provide a copy in that language of all written documents relating to the transaction, including the contract, disclosure notices, annual accounting statements, and a notice of default required by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 994, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.093 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 5.069. SELLER'S DISCLOSURE OF PROPERTY CONDITION. (a) Before an executory contract is signed by the purchaser, the seller shall provide the purchaser with:

(1) a survey, which was completed within the past year, or plat of a current survey of the real property;

(2) a legible copy of any document that describes an encumbrance or other claim, including a restrictive covenant or easement, that affects title to the real property; and

(3) a written notice, which must be attached to the contract, informing the purchaser of the condition of the property that must, at a minimum, be executed by the seller and purchaser and read substantially similar to the following:

WARNING

IF ANY OF THE ITEMS BELOW HAVE NOT BEEN CHECKED, YOU MAY NOT BE ABLE TO LIVE ON THE PROPERTY.

SELLER'S DISCLOSURE NOTICE

CONCERNING THE PROPERTY AT (street address or legal description and city)

THIS DOCUMENT STATES CERTAIN APPLICABLE FACTS ABOUT THE PROPERTY YOU ARE CONSIDERING PURCHASING.

CHECK ALL THE ITEMS THAT ARE APPLICABLE OR TRUE:

_____ The property is in a recorded subdivision.

_____ The property has water service that provides potable water.

_____ The property has sewer service.

_____ The property has been approved by the appropriate municipal, county, or state agency for installation of a septic system.

_____ The property has electric service.

_____ The property is not in a floodplain.

_____ The roads to the boundaries of the property are paved and maintained by:

_____ the seller;

_____ the owner of the property on which the road exists;

_____ the municipality;

_____ the county; or

_____ the state.

_____ No individual or entity other than the seller:

(1) owns the property;

(2) has a claim of ownership to the property; or

(3) has an interest in the property.

_____ No individual or entity has a lien filed against the property.

_____ There are no restrictive covenants, easements, or other title exceptions or encumbrances that prohibit construction of a house on the property.

NOTICE: SELLER ADVISES PURCHASER TO:

(1) OBTAIN A TITLE ABSTRACT OR TITLE COMMITMENT COVERING

THE PROPERTY AND HAVE THE ABSTRACT OR COMMITMENT REVIEWED

BY AN ATTORNEY BEFORE SIGNING A CONTRACT OF THIS TYPE; AND

(2) PURCHASE AN OWNER'S POLICY OF TITLE INSURANCE

COVERING THE PROPERTY.

_____________________________ ______________________________

(Date) (Signature of Seller)

_____________________________ ______________________________

(Date) (Signature of Purchaser)

(b) If the property is not located in a recorded subdivision, the seller shall provide the purchaser with a separate disclosure form stating that utilities may not be available to the property until the subdivision is recorded as required by law.

(c) If the seller advertises property for sale under an executory contract, the advertisement must disclose information regarding the availability of water, sewer, and electric service.

(d) The seller's failure to provide information required by this section:

(1) is a false, misleading, or deceptive act or practice within the meaning of Section 17.46, Business & Commerce Code, and is actionable in a public or private suit brought under Subchapter E, Chapter 17, Business & Commerce Code; and

(2) entitles the purchaser to cancel and rescind the executory contract and receive a full refund of all payments made to the seller.

(e) Subsection (d) does not limit the purchaser's remedy against the seller for other false, misleading, or deceptive acts or practices actionable in a suit brought under Subchapter E, Chapter 17, Business & Commerce Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 994, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.094 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 5.070. SELLER'S DISCLOSURE OF TAX PAYMENTS AND INSURANCE COVERAGE. (a) Before an executory contract is signed by the purchaser, the seller shall provide the purchaser with:

(1) a tax certificate from the collector for each taxing unit that collects taxes due on the property as provided by Section 31.08, Tax Code; and

(2) a legible copy of any insurance policy, binder, or other evidence relating to the property that indicates:

(A) the name of the insurer and the insured;

(B) a description of the property insured; and

(C) the amount for which the property is insured.

(b) The seller's failure to provide information required by this section:

(1) is a false, misleading, or deceptive act or practice within the meaning of Section 17.46, Business & Commerce Code, and is actionable in a public or private suit brought under Subchapter E, Chapter 17, Business & Commerce Code; and

(2) entitles the purchaser to cancel and rescind the executory contract and receive a full refund of all payments made to the seller.

(c) Subsection (b) does not limit the purchaser's remedy against the seller for other false, misleading, or deceptive acts or practices actionable in a suit brought under Subchapter E, Chapter 17, Business & Commerce Code.

(d) If the executory contract is recorded, the seller is not required to continue insuring the property.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 996 (H.B. 311), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 5.071. SELLER'S DISCLOSURE OF FINANCING TERMS. Before an executory contract is signed by the purchaser, the seller shall provide to the purchaser a written statement that specifies:

(1) the purchase price of the property;

(2) the interest rate charged under the contract;

(3) the dollar amount, or an estimate of the dollar amount if the interest rate is variable, of the interest charged for the term of the contract;

(4) the total amount of principal and interest to be paid under the contract;

(5) the late charge, if any, that may be assessed under the contract; and

(6) the fact that the seller may not charge a prepayment penalty or any similar fee if the purchaser elects to pay the entire amount due under the contract before the scheduled payment date under the contract.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 994, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.095 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 5.072. ORAL AGREEMENTS PROHIBITED. (a) An executory contract is not enforceable unless the contract is in writing and signed by the party to be bound or by that party's authorized representative.

(b) The rights and obligations of the parties to a contract are determined solely from the written contract, and any prior oral agreements between the parties are superseded by and merged into the contract.

(c) An executory contract may not be varied by any oral agreements or discussions that occur before or contemporaneously with the execution of the contract.

(d) The seller shall include in a separate document or in a provision of the contract a statement printed in 14-point boldfaced type or 14-point uppercase typewritten letters that reads substantially similar to the following:

THIS EXECUTORY CONTRACT REPRESENTS THE FINAL AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE SELLER AND PURCHASER AND MAY NOT BE CONTRADICTED BY EVIDENCE OF PRIOR, CONTEMPORANEOUS, OR SUBSEQUENT ORAL AGREEMENTS OF THE PARTIES. THERE ARE NO UNWRITTEN ORAL AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE PARTIES.

____________________________

____________________________

(Date)

(Signature of Seller)

____________________________

____________________________

(Date)

(Signature of Purchaser)

(e) The seller's failure to provide the notice required by this section:

(1) is a false, misleading, or deceptive act or practice within the meaning of Section 17.46, Business & Commerce Code, and is actionable in a public or private suit brought under Subchapter E, Chapter 17, Business & Commerce Code; and

(2) entitles the purchaser to cancel and rescind the executory contract and receive a full refund of all payments made to the seller.

(f) Subsection (e) does not limit the purchaser's remedy against the seller for other false, misleading, or deceptive acts or practices actionable in a suit brought under Subchapter E, Chapter 17, Business & Commerce Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 5.073. CONTRACT TERMS, CERTAIN WAIVERS PROHIBITED. (a) A seller may not include as a term of the executory contract a provision that:

(1) imposes an additional late-payment fee that exceeds the lesser of:

(A) eight percent of the monthly payment under the contract; or

(B) the actual administrative cost of processing the late payment;

(2) prohibits the purchaser from pledging the purchaser's interest in the property as security to obtain a loan to place improvements, including utility improvements or fire protection improvements, on the property;

(3) imposes a prepayment penalty or any similar fee if the purchaser elects to pay the entire amount due under the contract before the scheduled payment date under the contract;

(4) forfeits an option fee or other option payment paid under the contract for a late payment; or

(5) increases the purchase price, imposes a fee or charge of any type, or otherwise penalizes a purchaser leasing property with an option to buy the property for requesting repairs or exercising any other right under Chapter 92.

(b) A provision of the executory contract that purports to waive a right or exempt a party from a liability or duty under this subchapter is void.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 994, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.096 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 978 (H.B. 1823), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 5.074. PURCHASER'S RIGHT TO CANCEL CONTRACT WITHOUT CAUSE. (a) In addition to other rights or remedies provided by law, the purchaser may cancel and rescind an executory contract for any reason by sending by telegram or certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, or by delivering in person a signed, written notice of cancellation to the seller not later than the 14th day after the date of the contract.

(b) If the purchaser cancels the contract as provided by Subsection (a), the seller shall, not later than the 10th day after the date the seller receives the purchaser's notice of cancellation:

(1) return to the purchaser the executed contract and any property exchanged or payments made by the purchaser under the contract; and

(2) cancel any security interest arising out of the contract.

(c) The seller shall include in immediate proximity to the space reserved in the executory contract for the purchaser's signature a statement printed in 14-point boldface type or 14-point uppercase typewritten letters that reads substantially similar to the following:

YOU, THE PURCHASER, MAY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT AT ANY TIME DURING THE NEXT TWO WEEKS. THE DEADLINE FOR CANCELING THE CONTRACT IS (date). THE ATTACHED NOTICE OF CANCELLATION EXPLAINS THIS RIGHT.

(d) The seller shall provide a notice of cancellation form to the purchaser at the time the purchaser signs the executory contract that is printed in 14-point boldface type or 14-point uppercase typewritten letters and that reads substantially similar to the following:

(date of contract)

NOTICE OF CANCELLATION

YOU MAY CANCEL THE EXECUTORY CONTRACT FOR ANY REASON WITHOUT ANY PENALTY OR OBLIGATION BY (date).

(1) YOU MUST SEND BY TELEGRAM OR CERTIFIED OR REGISTERED MAIL, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED, OR DELIVER IN PERSON A SIGNED AND DATED COPY OF THIS CANCELLATION NOTICE OR ANY OTHER WRITTEN NOTICE TO (Name of Seller) AT (Seller's Address) BY (date).

(2) THE SELLER SHALL, NOT LATER THAN THE 10TH DAY AFTER THE DATE THE SELLER RECEIVES YOUR CANCELLATION NOTICE:

(A) RETURN THE EXECUTED CONTRACT AND ANY PROPERTY EXCHANGED OR PAYMENTS MADE BY YOU UNDER THE CONTRACT; AND

(B) CANCEL ANY SECURITY INTEREST ARISING OUT OF THE CONTRACT.

I ACKNOWLEDGE RECEIPT OF THIS NOTICE OF CANCELLATION FORM.

_________________________

_________________________

(Date) (Purchaser's Signature)

I HEREBY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT.

_________________________

_________________________

(Date) (Purchaser's Signature)

(e) The seller may not request the purchaser to sign a waiver of receipt of the notice of cancellation form required by this section.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 994, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.097 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 5.075. PURCHASER'S RIGHT TO PLEDGE INTEREST IN PROPERTY ON CONTRACTS ENTERED INTO BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2001. (a) On an executory contract entered into before September 1, 2001 , a purchaser may pledge the interest in the property, which accrues pursuant to Section 5.066, only to obtain a loan for improving the safety of the property or any improvements on the property.

(b) Loans that improve the safety of the property and improvements on the property include loans for:

(1) improving or connecting a residence to water service;

(2) improving or connecting a residence to a wastewater system;

(3) building or improving a septic system;

(4) structural improvements in the residence; and

(5) improved fire protection.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 994, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.098 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 5.076. RECORDING REQUIREMENTS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the seller shall record the executory contract, including the attached disclosure statement required by Section 5.069, as prescribed by Title 3 on or before the 30th day after the date the contract is executed.

(b) Section 12.002(c) does not apply to an executory contract filed for record under this section.

(c) If the executory contract is terminated for any reason, the seller shall record the instrument that terminates the contract.

(d) The county clerk shall collect the filing fee prescribed by Section 118.011, Local Government Code.

(e) A seller who violates this section is liable to the purchaser in the same manner and for the same amount as a seller who violates Section 5.079 is liable to a purchaser, except the damages may not exceed $500 for each calendar year of noncompliance. This subsection does not limit or affect any other rights or remedies a purchaser has under other law.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 994, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.099 and amended Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 996 (H.B. 311), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 5.077. ANNUAL ACCOUNTING STATEMENT. (a) The seller shall provide the purchaser with an annual statement in January of each year for the term of the executory contract. If the seller mails the statement to the purchaser, the statement must be postmarked not later than January 31.

(b) The statement must include the following information:

(1) the amount paid under the contract;

(2) the remaining amount owed under the contract;

(3) the number of payments remaining under the contract;

(4) the amounts paid to taxing authorities on the purchaser's behalf if collected by the seller;

(5) the amounts paid to insure the property on the purchaser's behalf if collected by the seller;

(6) if the property has been damaged and the seller has received insurance proceeds, an accounting of the proceeds applied to the property; and

(7) if the seller has changed insurance coverage, a legible copy of the current policy, binder, or other evidence that satisfies the requirements of Section 5.070(a)(2).

(c) A seller who conducts less than two transactions in a 12-month period under this section who fails to comply with Subsection (a) is liable to the purchaser for:

(1) liquidated damages in the amount of $100 for each annual statement the seller fails to provide to the purchaser within the time required by Subsection (a); and

(2) reasonable attorney's fees.

(d) A seller who conducts two or more transactions in a 12-month period under this section who fails to comply with Subsection (a) is liable to the purchaser for:

(1) liquidated damages in the amount of $250 a day for each day after January 31 that the seller fails to provide the purchaser with the statement, but not to exceed the fair market value of the property; and

(2) reasonable attorney's fees.

(e) The requirements of this section continue to apply after a purchaser obtains title to the property by conversion or any other process.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 994, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.100 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 978 (H.B. 1823), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 996 (H.B. 311), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 5.078. DISPOSITION OF INSURANCE PROCEEDS. (a) The named insured under an insurance policy, binder, or other coverage relating to property subject to an executory contract for the conveyance of real property shall inform the insurer, not later than the 10th day after the date the coverage is obtained or the contract executed, whichever is later, of:

(1) the executory contract for conveyance and the term of the contract; and

(2) the name and address of the other party to the contract.

(b) An insurer who disburses proceeds under an insurance policy, binder, or other coverage relating to property that has been damaged shall issue the proceeds jointly to the purchaser and the seller designated in the contract.

(c) If proceeds under an insurance policy, binder, or other coverage are disbursed, the purchaser and seller shall ensure that the proceeds are used to repair, remedy, or improve the condition on the property.

(d) The failure of a seller or purchaser to comply with Subsection (c) is a false, misleading, or deceptive act or practice within the meaning of Section 17.46, Business & Commerce Code, and is actionable in a public or private suit brought under Subchapter E, Chapter 17, Business & Commerce Code.

(e) Subsection (d) does not limit either party's remedy for other false, misleading, or deceptive acts or practices actionable in a suit brought under Subchapter E, Chapter 17, Business & Commerce Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 5.079. TITLE TRANSFER. (a) A recorded executory contract shall be the same as a deed with a vendor's lien. The vendor's lien is for the amount of the unpaid contract price, less any lawful deductions, and may be enforced by foreclosure sale under Section 5.066 or by judicial foreclosure. A general warranty is implied unless otherwise limited by the recorded executory contract. If an executory contract has not been recorded or converted under Section 5.081, the seller shall transfer recorded, legal title of the property covered by the executory contract to the purchaser not later than the 30th day after the date the seller receives the purchaser's final payment due under the contract.

(b) A seller who violates Subsection (a) is liable to the purchaser for:

(1) liquidated damages in the amount of:

(A) $250 a day for each day the seller fails to transfer the title to the purchaser during the period that begins the 31st day and ends the 90th day after the date the seller receives the purchaser's final payment due under the contract; and

(B) $500 a day for each day the seller fails to transfer title to the purchaser after the 90th day after the date the seller receives the purchaser's final payment due under the contract; and

(2) reasonable attorney's fees.

(c) If a person to whom a seller's property interest passes by will or intestate succession is required to obtain a court order to clarify the person's status as an heir or to clarify the status of the seller or the property before the person may convey good and indefeasible title to the property, the court in which the action is pending may waive payment of the liquidated damages and attorney's fees under Subsection (b) if the court finds that the person is pursuing the action to establish good and indefeasible title with reasonable diligence.

(d) In this section, "seller" includes a successor, assignee, personal representative, executor, or administrator of the seller.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 994, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.102 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 996 (H.B. 311), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 5.080. LIABILITY FOR DISCLOSURES. For purposes of this subchapter, a disclosure required by this subchapter that is made by a seller's agent is a disclosure made by the seller.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 994, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Property Code Sec. 5.103 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 5.081. RIGHT TO CONVERT CONTRACT. (a) A purchaser, at any time and without paying penalties or charges of any kind, is entitled to convert the purchaser's interest in property under an executory contract into recorded, legal title in accordance with this section, regardless of whether the seller has recorded the executory contract.

(b) If the purchaser tenders to the seller an amount of money equal to the balance of the total amount owed by the purchaser to the seller under the executory contract, the seller shall transfer to the purchaser recorded, legal title of the property covered by the contract.

(c) Subject to Subsection (d), if the purchaser delivers to the seller of property covered by an executory contract a promissory note that is equal in amount to the balance of the total amount owed by the purchaser to the seller under the contract and that contains the same interest rate, due dates, and late fees as the contract:

(1) the seller shall execute a deed containing any warranties required by the contract and conveying to the purchaser recorded, legal title of the property; and

(2) the purchaser shall simultaneously execute a deed of trust that:

(A) contains the same terms as the contract regarding the purchaser's and seller's duties concerning the property;

(B) secures the purchaser's payment and performance under the promissory note and deed of trust; and

(C) conveys the property to the trustee, in trust, and confers on the trustee the power to sell the property if the purchaser defaults on the promissory note or the terms of the deed of trust.

(d) On or before the 10th day after the date the seller receives a promissory note under Subsection (c) that substantially complies with that subsection, the seller shall:

(1) deliver to the purchaser a written explanation that legally justifies why the seller refuses to convert the purchaser's interest into recorded, legal title under Subsection (c); or

(2) communicate with the purchaser to schedule a mutually agreeable day and time to execute the deed and deed of trust under Subsection (c).

(e) A seller who violates this section is liable to the purchaser in the same manner and amount as a seller who violates Section 5.079 is liable to a purchaser. This subsection does not limit or affect any other rights or remedies a purchaser has under other law.

(f) On the last date that all of the conveyances described by Subsections (b) and (c) are executed, the executory contract:

(1) is considered completed; and

(2) has no further effect.

(g) The appropriate use of forms published by the Texas Real Estate Commission for transactions described by this section constitutes compliance with this section.

(h) This section may not be construed to limit the purchaser's interest in the property established by other law, if any, or any other rights of the purchaser under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 978 (H.B. 1823), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 996 (H.B. 311), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 5.082. REQUEST FOR BALANCE AND TRUSTEE. (a) A purchaser under an executory contract, on written request, is entitled to receive the following information from the seller:

(1) as of the date of the request or another date specified by the purchaser, the amount owed by the purchaser under the contract; and

(2) if applicable, the name and address of the seller's desired trustee for a deed of trust to be executed under Section 5.081.

(b) On or before the 10th day after the date the seller receives from the purchaser a written request for information described by Subsection (a), the seller shall provide to the purchaser a written statement of the requested information.

(c) If the seller does not timely respond to a request made under this section, the purchaser may:

(1) determine or pay the amount owed under the contract, including determining the amount necessary for a promissory note under Section 5.081; and

(2) if applicable, select a trustee for a deed of trust under Section 5.081.

(d) For purposes of Subsection (c)(2), a purchaser must select a trustee that lives or has a place of business in the same county where the property covered by the executory contract is located.

(e) Not later than the 20th day after the date a seller receives notice of an amount determined by a purchaser under Subsection (c)(1), the seller may contest that amount by sending a written objection to the purchaser. An objection under this subsection must:

(1) be sent to the purchaser by regular and certified mail;

(2) include the amount the seller claims is the amount owed under the contract; and

(3) be based on written records kept by the seller or the seller's agent that were maintained and regularly updated for the entire term of the executory contract.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 978 (H.B. 1823), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 5.083. RIGHT TO CANCEL CONTRACT FOR IMPROPER PLATTING. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c), in addition to other rights or remedies provided by law, the purchaser may cancel and rescind an executory contract at any time if the purchaser learns that the seller has not properly subdivided or platted the property that is covered by the contract in accordance with state and local law. A purchaser canceling and rescinding a contract under this subsection must:

(1) deliver a signed, written notice of the cancellation and rescission to the seller in person; or

(2) send a signed, written notice of the cancellation and rescission to the seller by telegram or certified or registered mail, return receipt requested.

(b) If the purchaser cancels the contract as provided under Subsection (a), the seller, not later than the 10th day after the date the seller receives the notice of cancellation and rescission, shall:

(1) deliver in person or send by telegram or certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, to the purchaser a signed, written notice that the seller intends to subdivide or plat the property properly; or

(2) return to the purchaser all payments of any kind made to the seller under the contract and reimburse the purchaser for:

(A) any payments the purchaser made to a taxing authority for the property; and

(B) the value of any improvements made to the property by the purchaser.

(c) A purchaser may not exercise the purchaser's right to cancel and rescind an executory contract under this section if, on or before the 90th day after the date the purchaser receives the seller's notice under Subsection (b)(1), the seller:

(1) properly subdivides or plats the property; and

(2) delivers in person or sends by telegram or certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, to the purchaser a signed, written notice evidencing that the property has been subdivided or platted in accordance with state and local law.

(d) The seller may not terminate the purchaser's possession of the property covered by the contract being canceled and rescinded before the seller pays the purchaser any money to which the purchaser is entitled under Subsection (b).

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 978 (H.B. 1823), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 5.084. RIGHT TO DEDUCT. If a seller is liable to a purchaser under this subchapter, the purchaser, without taking judicial action, may deduct the amount owed to the purchaser by the seller from any amounts owed to the seller by the purchaser under the terms of an executory contract.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 978 (H.B. 1823), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 5.085. FEE SIMPLE TITLE REQUIRED; MAINTENANCE OF FEE SIMPLE TITLE. (a) A potential seller may not execute an executory contract with a potential purchaser if the seller does not own the property in fee simple free from any liens or other encumbrances.

(b) Except as provided by this subsection, a seller, or the seller's heirs or assigns, must maintain fee simple title free from any liens or other encumbrances to property covered by an executory contract for the entire duration of the contract. This subsection does not apply to a lien or encumbrance placed on the property that is:

(1) placed on the property because of the conduct of the purchaser;

(2) agreed to by the purchaser as a condition of a loan obtained to place improvements on the property, including utility or fire protection improvements; or

(3) placed on the property by the seller prior to the execution of the contract in exchange for a loan used only to purchase the property if:

(A) the seller, not later than the third day before the date the contract is executed, notifies the purchaser in a separate written disclosure:

(i) of the name, address, and phone number of the lienholder or, if applicable, servicer of the loan;

(ii) of the loan number and outstanding balance of the loan;

(iii) of the monthly payments due on the loan and the due date of those payments; and

(iv) in 14-point type that, if the seller fails to make timely payments to the lienholder, the lienholder may attempt to collect the debt by foreclosing on the lien and selling the property at a foreclosure sale;

(B) the lien:

(i) is attached only to the property sold to the purchaser under the contract; and

(ii) secures indebtedness that, at no time, is or will be greater in amount than the amount of the total outstanding balance owed by the purchaser under the executory contract;

(C) the lienholder:

(i) does not prohibit the property from being encumbered by an executory contract; and

(ii) consents to verify the status of the loan on request of the purchaser and to accept payments directly from the purchaser if the seller defaults on the loan; and

(D) the following covenants are placed in the executory contract:

(i) a covenant that obligates the seller to make timely payments on the loan and to give monthly statements to the purchaser reflecting the amount paid to the lienholder, the date the lienholder receives the payment, and the information described by Paragraph (A);

(ii) a covenant that obligates the seller, not later than the third day the seller receives or has actual knowledge of a document or an event described by this subparagraph, to notify the purchaser in writing in 14-point type that the seller has been sent a notice of default, notice of acceleration, or notice of foreclosure or has been sued in connection with a lien on the property and to attach a copy of all related documents received to the written notice; and

(iii) a covenant that warrants that if the seller does not make timely payments on the loan or any other indebtedness secured by the property, the purchaser may, without notice, cure any deficiency with a lienholder directly and deduct from the total outstanding balance owed by the purchaser under the executory contract, without the necessity of judicial action, 150 percent of any amount paid to the lienholder.

(c) A violation of this section:

(1) is a false, misleading, or deceptive act or practice within the meaning of Section 17.46, Business & Commerce Code, and is actionable in a public or private suit brought under Subchapter E, Chapter 17, Business & Commerce Code; and

(2) in addition to other rights or remedies provided by law, entitles the purchaser to cancel and rescind the executory contract and receive from the seller:

(A) the return of all payments of any kind made to the seller under the contract; and

(B) reimbursement for:

(i) any payments the purchaser made to a taxing authority for the property; and

(ii) the value of any improvements made to the property by the purchaser.

(d) A seller is not liable under this section if:

(1) a lien is placed on the property by a person other than the seller; and

(2) not later than the 30th day after the date the seller receives notice of the lien, the seller takes all steps necessary to remove the lien and has the lien removed from the property.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 978 (H.B. 1823), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 5.087. ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS: CERTAIN COUNTIES. (a) This section applies only to a county adopting an order under Section 5.0622.

(b) The commissioners court may not modify the provisions of this subchapter except the commissioners court may provide in the order that an executory contract to which the order applies may not be used to purchase land for residential purposes unless the conversion authorized by Section 5.081 is required to occur not later than three years after the date the executory contract is entered into.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 911 (H.B. 4374), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER F. REQUIREMENTS FOR CONVEYANCES OF MINERAL OR ROYALTY INTERESTS

Sec. 5.151. DISCLOSURE IN OFFER TO PURCHASE MINERAL INTEREST. (a) A person who mails to the owner of a mineral or royalty interest an offer to purchase only the mineral or royalty interest, it being understood that for the purpose of this section the taking of an oil, gas, or mineral lease shall not be deemed a purchase of a mineral or royalty interest, and encloses an instrument of conveyance of only the mineral or royalty interest and a draft or other instrument, as defined in Section 3.104, Business & Commerce Code, providing for payment for that interest shall include in the offer a conspicuous statement printed in a type style that is approximately the same size as 14-point type style or larger and is in substantially the following form:

BY EXECUTING AND DELIVERING THIS INSTRUMENT YOU ARE SELLING ALL OR A PORTION OF YOUR MINERAL OR ROYALTY INTEREST IN (DESCRIPTION OF PROPERTY BEING CONVEYED).

(b) A person who conveys a mineral or royalty interest as provided by Subsection (a) may bring suit against the purchaser of the interest if:

(1) the purchaser did not give the notice required by Subsection (a); and

(2) the person has given 30 days' written notice to the purchaser that a suit will be filed unless the matter is otherwise resolved.

(c) A plaintiff who prevails in a suit under Subsection (b) may recover from the initial purchaser of the mineral or royalty interest the greater of:

(1) $100; or

(2) an amount up to the difference between the amount paid by the purchaser for the mineral or royalty interest and the fair market value of the mineral or royalty interest at the time of the sale.

(d) The prevailing party in a suit under Subsection (b) may recover:

(1) court costs; and

(2) reasonable attorney's fees.

(e) A person must bring a suit under Subsection (b) not later than the second anniversary of the date the person executed the conveyance.

(f) The remedy provided under this section shall be in addition to any other remedies existing under law, excluding rescission or other remedies that would make the conveyance of the mineral or royalty interest void or of no force and effect.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1200, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 5.152. CERTAIN PURCHASES OF MINERAL OR ROYALTY INTERESTS VOID. (a) This section applies only to the conveyance of a mineral or royalty interest by an instrument that:

(1) is presented to the owner of the interest by the person acquiring the interest;

(2) is titled an oil and gas lease or an oil and gas royalty lease or has other words in the caption or other prominently displayed label that indicate that the transaction is a lease of a mineral or royalty interest; and

(3) has the effect of conveying, permanently or for a term, all or a portion of the owner's:

(A) mineral interest in lands covered by an existing oil, gas, or mineral lease; or

(B) royalty interest in production from an existing oil, gas, or mineral lease.

(b) This section does not apply to a conveyance of a mineral or royalty interest by an instrument that:

(1) is an oil, gas, or mineral lease;

(2) conveys a mineral or royalty interest for a term; and

(3) provides that the interest conveyed vests in possession after the expiration or termination of all or a portion of the interest conveyed by an existing oil, gas, or mineral lease in effect at the time of the execution of the instrument, commonly referred to as a top lease.

(c) A conveyance instrument described by Subsection (a) must include:

(1) a conspicuous statement printed at the top of the first page of the instrument below the caption, if any, in an approximate type size of at least 14 points and in substantially the following form:

THIS IS NOT AN OIL AND GAS LEASE. YOU ARE SELLING ALL OR A PORTION OF YOUR MINERAL OR ROYALTY INTERESTS IN (DESCRIPTION OF PROPERTY BEING CONVEYED).

; and

(2) a conspicuous statement printed at the top of each subsequent page of the instrument and immediately above the signature of the person conveying the interest in an approximate type size of at least 14 points and in substantially the following form:

THIS IS NOT AN OIL AND GAS LEASE. YOU ARE SELLING ALL OR A PORTION OF YOUR MINERAL OR ROYALTY INTERESTS.

(d) If the conveyance instrument does not include the statements required by Subsection (c), the conveyance is void.

(e) A person who has conveyed a royalty or mineral interest in a conveyance that is void under this section may bring suit against the purchaser of the interest to remove the conveyance as a cloud on title and may recover from the purchaser:

(1) all royalties and bonuses paid to the purchaser and any successor or assign of the purchaser;

(2) court costs; and

(3) reasonable attorney's fees.

(f) The remedies under this section are in addition to any other rights or remedies a person may have at law or pursuant to contract.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 914 (H.B. 3838), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER G. CERTAIN PRIVATE TRANSFER FEES PROHIBITED; PRESERVATION OF PRIVATE REAL PROPERTY RIGHTS

Sec. 5.201. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Encumbered property" means all property, including the property of a subsequent purchaser, subject to the same private transfer fee obligation.

(2) "Lender" means a lending institution, including a bank, trust company, banking association, savings and loan association, mortgage company, investment bank, credit union, life insurance company, and governmental agency, that customarily provides financing or an affiliate of a lending institution.

(3) "Payee" means a person who claims the right to receive or collect a private transfer fee payable under a private transfer fee obligation and who may or may not have a pecuniary interest in the obligation.

(4) "Private transfer fee" means an amount of money, regardless of the method of determining the amount, that is payable on the transfer of an interest in real property or payable for a right to make or accept a transfer.

(5) "Private transfer fee obligation" means an obligation to pay a private transfer fee created under:

(A) a declaration or other covenant recorded in the real property records in the county in which the property subject to the private transfer fee obligation is located;

(B) a contractual agreement or promise; or

(C) an unrecorded contractual agreement or promise.

(6) "Subsequent owner" means a person who acquires real property by transfer from a person other than the person who is the seller of the property on the date the private transfer fee obligation is created.

(7) "Subsequent purchaser" means a person who purchases real property from a person other than the person who is the seller on the date the private transfer fee obligation is created. The term includes a lender who provides a mortgage loan to a subsequent purchaser to purchase the property.

(8) "Transfer" means the sale, gift, conveyance, assignment, inheritance, or other transfer of an ownership interest in real property.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 8), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 5.202. CERTAIN PRIVATE TRANSFER FEE OBLIGATIONS VOID. (a) Except as provided by this subchapter, a private transfer fee obligation created on or after the effective date of this subchapter is not binding or enforceable against a subsequent owner or subsequent purchaser of an interest in real property and is void.

(b) For purposes of this subchapter, the following payments are not considered private transfer fee obligations:

(1) consideration paid by a purchaser to a seller for an interest in real property transferred, including, as applicable, a mineral interest transferred, including additional consideration paid to a seller for the property's appreciation, development, or sale after the interest in the property has been transferred to the purchaser, if the additional consideration is paid only once and that payment does not bind successors in interest to the property to any private transfer fee obligation;

(2) a commission paid to a licensed real estate broker under a written agreement between a seller or purchaser and the broker, including an additional commission for the property's appreciation, development, or sale after the interest in property is transferred to the purchaser;

(3) interest, a fee, a charge, or another type of payment to a lender under a loan secured by a mortgage on the property, including:

(A) a fee payable for the lender's consent to an assumption of the loan or transfer of the property subject to the mortgage;

(B) a fee or charge payable for an estoppel letter or certificate;

(C) a shared appreciation interest or profit participation; or

(D) other consideration payable in connection with the loan;

(4) rent, reimbursement, a fee, a charge, or another type of payment to a lessor under a lease, including a fee for consent to an assignment, sublease, encumbrance, or transfer of a lease;

(5) consideration paid to the holder of an option to purchase an interest in property, or to the holder of a right of first refusal or first offer to purchase an interest in property, for waiving, releasing, or not exercising the option or right when the property is transferred to another person;

(6) a fee payable to or imposed by a governmental entity in connection with recording the transfer of the property;

(7) dues, a fee, a charge, an assessment, a fine, a contribution, or another type of payment under a declaration or other covenant or under law, including a fee or charge payable for a change of ownership entered in the records of an association to which this subdivision applies or an estoppel letter or resale certificate issued under Section 207.003 by an association to which this subdivision applies or the person identified under Section 209.004(a)(6), provided that no portion of the fee or charge is required to be passed through to a third party designated or identifiable in the declaration or other covenant or law or in a document referenced in the declaration or other covenant or law, unless paid to:

(A) an association as defined by Section 82.003 or 221.002 or the person or entity managing the association as provided by Section 82.116(a)(5) or 221.032(b)(11), as applicable;

(B) a property owners' association as defined by Section 202.001 or 209.002 or the person or entity described by Section 209.004(a)(6); or

(C) a property owners' association as defined by Section 202.001 that does not require an owner of property governed by the association to be a member of the association or the person or entity described by Section 209.004(a)(6);

(8) dues, a fee, a charge, an assessment, a fine, a contribution, or another type of payment for the transfer of a club membership related to the property;

(9) dues, a fee, a charge, an assessment, a fine, a contribution, or another type of payment paid to an organization exempt from federal taxation under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4), Internal Revenue Code of 1986, only if the organization uses the payments to directly benefit the encumbered property by:

(A) supporting or maintaining only the encumbered property;

(B) constructing or repairing improvements only to the encumbered property; or

(C) providing activities or infrastructure to support quality of life, including cultural, educational, charitable, recreational, environmental, and conservation activities and infrastructure, that directly benefit the encumbered property; or

(10) a fee payable to or imposed by the Veterans' Land Board for consent to an assumption or transfer of a contract of sale and purchase.

(c) The benefit described by Subsection (b)(9)(C) may collaterally benefit:

(1) a community composed of:

(A) property that is adjacent to the encumbered property; or

(B) property a boundary of which is not more than 1,000 yards from a boundary of the encumbered property; or

(2) with respect to a payment to a school for educational activities, property not described by Subdivision (1) if the encumbered property is located within:

(A) the school's assigned attendance zone; and

(B) a county with a population of more than 650,000 that is adjacent to two counties, each of which has a population of more than 1.8 million.

(d) Notwithstanding Subsection (c), an organization may provide a direct benefit under Subsection (b)(9) if:

(1) the organization provides to the general public activities or infrastructure described by Subsection (b)(9)(C);

(2) the provision of activities or infrastructure substantially benefits the encumbered property; and

(3) the governing body of the organization:

(A) is controlled by owners of the encumbered property; and

(B) approves payments for activities or infrastructure at least annually.

(e) An organization may provide activities and infrastructure described by Subsection (b)(9)(C) to another organization exempt from federal taxation under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4), Internal Revenue Code of 1986, at no charge for de minimis usage without violating the requirements of this section.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 8), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 812 (H.B. 755), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 5.203. NOTICE REQUIREMENTS FOR CONTINUATION OF EXISTING PRIVATE TRANSFER FEE OBLIGATIONS. (a) A person who receives a private transfer fee under a private transfer fee obligation created before the effective date of this subchapter must, on or before January 31, 2012, file for record a "Notice of Private Transfer Fee Obligation" as provided by this section in the real property records of each county in which the property is located.

(b) Multiple payees of a single private transfer fee under a private transfer fee obligation must designate one payee as the payee of record for the fee.

(c) A notice under Subsection (a) must:

(1) be printed in at least 14-point boldface type;

(2) state the amount of the private transfer fee and the method of determination, if applicable;

(3) state the date or any circumstance under which the private transfer fee obligation expires, if any;

(4) state the purpose for which the money from the private transfer fee obligation will be used;

(5) notwithstanding Subsection (b), state the name of each payee and each payee's contact information;

(6) state the name and address of the payee of record to whom the payment of the fee must be sent;

(7) include the acknowledged signature of each payee or authorized representative of each payee; and

(8) state the legal description of the property subject to the private transfer fee obligation.

(d) A person required to file a notice under this section shall:

(1) refile the notice described by this section not earlier than the 30th day before the third anniversary of the original filing date described by Subsection (a) and within a similar 30-day period every third year thereafter; and

(2) amend the notice to reflect any change in the name or address of any payee included in the notice not later than the 30th day after the date the change occurs.

(e) A person who amends a notice under Subsection (d)(2) must include:

(1) the recording information of the original notice filed as required by this section; and

(2) the legal description of the property subject to the private transfer fee obligation.

(f) If a person required to file a notice under this section fails to comply with this section:

(1) payment of the private transfer fee may not be a requirement for the conveyance of an interest in the property to a purchaser;

(2) the property is not subject to further obligation under the private transfer fee obligation; and

(3) the private transfer fee obligation is void.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 8), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 5.204. ADDITIONAL COMPLIANCE REQUIREMENT: TIMELY ACCEPTANCE OF FEES PAID UNDER EXISTING PRIVATE TRANSFER FEE OBLIGATIONS. (a) The payee of record on the date a private transfer fee is paid under a private transfer fee obligation subject to Section 5.203 must accept the payment on or before the 30th day after the date the payment is tendered to the payee.

(b) If the payee of record fails to comply with Subsection (a):

(1) the payment must be returned to the remitter;

(2) payment of the private transfer fee may not be a requirement for the conveyance of an interest in the property to a purchaser; and

(3) the property is not subject to further obligation under the private transfer fee obligation.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 8), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 5.205. DISCLOSURE OF EXISTING TRANSFER FEE OBLIGATION REQUIRED IN CONTRACT FOR SALE. A seller of real property that may be subject to a private transfer fee obligation shall provide written notice to a potential purchaser stating that the obligation may be governed by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 8), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 5.206. WAIVER VOID. A provision that purports to waive a purchaser's rights under this subchapter is void.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 8), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 5.207. INJUNCTIVE OR DECLARATORY RELIEF; PROVIDING PENALTIES. (a) The attorney general may institute an action for injunctive or declaratory relief to restrain a violation of this subchapter.

(b) In addition to instituting an action for injunctive or declaratory relief under Subsection (a), the attorney general may institute an action for civil penalties against a payee for a violation of this chapter. Except as provided by Subsection (c), a civil penalty assessed under this section may not exceed an amount equal to two times the amount of the private transfer fee charged or collected by the payee in violation of this subchapter.

(c) If the court in which an action under Subsection (b) is pending finds that a payee violated this subchapter with a frequency that constitutes a pattern or practice, the court may assess a civil penalty not to exceed $250,000.

(d) The comptroller shall deposit to the credit of the general revenue fund all money collected under this section.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 8), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.